We got balloon hats also where we ate lunch! If you go, the guacamole they make table-side is DELICIOUS!
Tomorrow, I also have a Shakespeare production to look forward to - The Winter's Tale, and it's an all-male cast (so will be interesting for son from a drama perspective as well as English Lit). Am also making plans with lovely best friend because my London trip in September coincides with an exhibition that includes my all-time favourite artist. Then we have to choose between a production at the Globe and King Lear with Jonathan Pryce. (We can't do both. Can we? No, we'd be zombies. Hmm. How bad can I be?)
When Cash got to the Tigers he pretty much immediately took over first base, adding a .402 OBA to some pretty good stats. In '61 he had a monster year, leading the AL in hits, average, and OBA (with a .489), but only coming in fourth in MVP votes in the year of the M and M boys in NY. It was also revealed later that he'd corked his bat that year, or at least part of it. While he was never able to match those stats again he was a better than average power guy and fielder at first for the rest of the decade, hitting more than 20 homers each season. In '62 he nearly matched his '61 homer total though his average fell over 100 points. After a couple good years in '63 and '64 he was halfway through the '65 season and was hitting .204 with seven homers and 24 RBI's. The rest of the season he hit 23 homers with 58 RBI's in 78 games, while hitting over .300 to pull his final average up over 60 points. That second half won him his first Comeback of the Year award. In '66 he made his second All-Star team with stepped up stats although that was the first season his strikeout totals exceeded his walks. He was also putting down the sauce pretty good by then and after a significant downtick in '67 experienced another slow start in the big Series year of '68. But he again hit well over .300 in the second half and then turned it on in the Series by hitting .385 with a homer and five ribbies in seven games. He continued his rally in '69 and then hit a wall in '70 when injuries led to his smallest homer output since his ChiSox days. In '71 his big bounce doubled his homer output and nearly did the same to his RBI count. It also landed him two successive All-Star selections and his second Comeback Player award. He got a bit more post-season action following the '72 season and then began his slide. By August '74 he was done. Norm finished with a .271 average with 377 homers and 1,103 RBI's. He also put up a .374 OBA. In the post-season he hit .311 with two homers and seven RBI's in 45 at bats. He ranks in the top 25 in games and assists at first base and in the top 50 in putouts.
So what are these wonderful new nuts I here you ask... well let me introduce you to Cedar Nuts, which are the seeds of the Swiss Pine. See how knowledgeable I am? And do you know what the very best thing about them are, that whenever Stuart and Janie are watching a program on the telly, if I make enough noise, they give me one to shut me up. Tee Hee !!!
The travel writing gig — it’s just a small example. But there are other dreams out there just like them. (Insert yours) Which is absolutely not to say we shouldn’t follow our dreams. (Ack. Double negative. Sorry!) Or that we shouldn’t do what we can to make them happen. Not at all.
But then the cravings start and MY GOD THE CRAVINGS!
But you get the point… My body does not like high amounts of fats and sugar so much that I felt physically sick.
to create another closing than is expected
Esther’s Call II picks up where we left off, at chapter 2 verse 19. We will look at Mordecai, Haman, and open up the concept of providence when we study Esther’s intercession for her people.
This is a poor photo of ‘Baronne Prevost’. Breezes don’t make for in-focus photos. Wave to the camera, pretty flower! The truth is that I was not intent on showing you the flower but rather the icky mess on her leaves to the right, known as damask crud, a technical term, to go along with her luscious damask scent.
Update: Mum (using her lovely Mac) has managed to clean up one of my photos and it looks a bit better!
With Minced Meat, Topped With Bechamel Sauce,
I know from raising my own kids that children enjoy hearing stories about other children. they naturally relate better to the characters in books in this way. I also wanted to tell a story about a close and personal relationship between two boys who had a lot of fun together, and one grew up to become famous.
How has believing and following Jesus Christ turned from a walk of simplicity of faith into something seemingly full of convoluted intricacies. (I cringe to see this written)
And just so we’re clear: The school has $100 million in construction underway. Each building comes with a promise of newness and foundation; beyond that, RWU is located in Bristol, a beautiful New England haven, saddled by water on both sides. In fact, there are moments when I cross the campus and I’m stunned by the beauty of the setting.
The gun needs a good cleaning and holster. But I am already enjoying it. I've taken it hunting, and have plans on taking some hogs with it soon.
Here is the challenge inspiration picture for this week.
I showed him the whole house. We hung out in my room, in the den, and ran up and down the glossy brick hallway between the den and the living room. I was having the time of my life. The dog eventually found the little half bath we had between the kitchen and the door that went into the garage. It had a sliding door so it was always open. My new friend promptly began drinking out of the toilet bowl. I was freaking out.
There is no logic in luck
But I heard him exclaim, ere he drove out of sight,
I will commission this blog OPEN, with a gallery post of my most recently painted things from my flickr account.
Mario & Luigi 2Mario And Luigi: Ally In Time
SOUPES
1) Vanilla cupcake with cream cheese frosting, triple berry puree and a strawberry.
Place 2 tsp of the sugar mixture in the bottom of each martini glass. Pour in the vodka and apple cider. Garnish with a cinnamon stick in order to stir the drink together before enjoying. (Can also be made with just apple cider for a non-alcoholic drink.)
There is also NO RIGHT to a Smoke Free environment. A Smoke Free environment is a personal preference.
Christie
Um, excuse me? The tour is supposed to be two full days. What do you mean there’s only a half day today? We’re supposed to see a lake, and a forest. All day.
and hugged our home
in the method given in the kalpa,
Sun, 11:25pm: How am I going to find a freakin’ dentist?
Margot chases her friend to Scotland, determined to prove her guilty of murder. No one will stop Margot. Not the SAS agent sent to watch her…and not the Scottish lord legend says murders his lovers when they cannot free him from the spell that has imprisoned him in Castle Morrison for three hundred years.
By Emma Webb
This programme is a tiny nugget of joy, a simple, sometimes gentle but always sharply accurate picture of life when you're trying your best in London- that it happens to be about a Rev is to some extent by the by. That said I think the portrayal of the Reverend Adam Smallbone as a very real human being is doing an enormous amount for certainly this person's view of the church.
Thank you everyone for stopping by today and entering my giveaway for the Leap Day Blog Hop. I used Random Number Generator and the lucking winner is:
Scarf - M&S
There is no doubt that Hermanus was the victim of a ritual killing. Although his strong physical characteristics were much admired by the tribal chiefs, he was also considered a threat. The heart and sex organs were valuable commodities in the various ritual acts of the savage. They also believed that if a person with a strong fiery spirit was killed then that same spirit would enter the tribal chief who ordered the killing.
Moving further north, I reached the Protected Areas and Wildlife Bureau (PAWB) and the Wildlife Rescue Center. PAWB has been saving endangered species from illegal traders and pet owners such as eagles and parrots. These animals are being rehabilitated and eventually released in their own habitat. The park also takes care of several indigenous plants and animals like Crab-Eating Macaques, Water Monitors, Philippine Deer, Binturongs, Bearded Pigs and various marine and bird species.
If you have decided that you really want to make finding free things one of your main goals, then you need to become a detective. You really need to acquire all of the skills of a talented sleuth. You need to learn skills that are specific to your trade.
yes (+3)
There are also many other peoples in the world who – even as adults – don’t exist in a state of separateness. Most of the world’s indigenous peoples don’t see themselves as separate to their environment. They feel a strong sense of connection to nature, an awareness that they are a part of the web of creation (and one which is no more important than any other). As Tim Ingold writes of the Batek Negritos of Malaysia, for example, ‘They see themselves as involved in an intimate relationship of interdependence with the plants, animals and hala’ [spirits] (including the deities) which inhabit their world.’ Or as the Cherokee Indian scholar Rebecca Adamson points out, for indigenous peoples ‘the environment is perceived as a sensate, conscious entity suffused with spiritual powers through which the human understanding is only realised in perfect humility before the sacred whole.’ The Hopi use the term Novoitti for the concept of living in harmony with nature, while the Tlingit (also of North America) call it Shogan.
This is just a little check in....I haven't died. We have been under the weather around here and then I started a juice detox Monday night so I haven't been in writing mode. Z was sure to let it be known that there wouldn't be a "detox clause" or a "period clause" ( oh yah...i have that too) so I have been EXTRA good. I haven't been spanked...really spanked...for over a week and it feels fabulous. I think Z is missing it though....because for no reason this afternoon he walks by, grabs me by the arm...puts his hand in the waistband of my yoga pants and pulls them down. Over the bed I went as he proceeded to smack away. It wasn't a long spanking...just a "drive by shooting" of sorts - yep, he misses it. If you were to ask him he would tell you that he likes me to be good...but then he starts missing beating me. A girl can't win.
Do we really mean that limiting access to my psycho-active substance of choice is bad, whereas those other drugs (other's choices) need controlling. Is this something to do with the "Narcissism of small differences"?
Some days later at an undiclosed location
We have at of scrap wood left over from various build projects, so this project was pretty close to free. Actually, it cost $5 for the spray paint and pictures.
PROS
Ok I am dancing with joy at these changes. Thank you Mr. Erickson.
Tomorrow's plan: begin coil building owl totems. Then porcelain class in afternoon. Possible chicken tile painting.
“Wait!” He stood up from the couch.
Who faithfully practice their religion;
As well as bringing along her stash for the group to use Sandra had made a selection of tags for us to choose one from to keep. This is the one I chose. The second picture shows the lovely sheen it has when you catch it in a certain light.
I made this the other night and it turned out so well I had to share... This is something that I put together and thankfully it turned out well. Pardon the canned items that I used for the sauce!
T’Pau China in your hand UK
8. Some people think he is deserving of the honor because he proved the world was round, but this was already a widely accepted belief by educated people at the time as Ptolemy, the ancient astronomer and geographer from Egypt, declared that the Earth was spherical in the second century. Why do 17 states refuse to recognize and/or celebrate Columbus Day? Why do protesters gather and march at every Columbus Day Parade?
Preaching… Stirs up the spirit… It’s the spirit part of us that God touches and the part of us that touches God. Jesus was stirring up the spirit of the people and getting them to be in touch with God. Preaching gives you hope… preaching raises your expectations… The word “preaching” means to proclaim a message… to urge acceptance of a message.
Rebekah has on her hot pink cast from fracturing her wrist while jumping off a swing. She's also holding the teddy bear that she received at the hospital. She has named him Teddy.
Huntsman: I have to beat market expectations
It depends on what kind of company you work for, but in an office setting, I’d imagine items like toner and ink cartridges for printers and copiers. Copy paper, ink pens, file folders, forms you use on a regular basis, or anything else necessary to keep things organized and running efficiently. There’s nothing worse than printing a big project, only to realize half-way through that your pages are coming out blank. You’ve run out of ink, and of course, there’s no backup on site to replace it.
in books.
The whole of The Peach Keeper is infused with coffee and glorious food and sunshine and the mystery of the South. If you've liked any of the other books I've ever recommended, you will enjoy and come to love Sarah Addison Allen's writing. There is a magic to her books that transports you - and that's what good writing does, no matter how dull and wet the weather is outside or how miserable you feel in yourself.
Apparently Seattle, on average, gets 58 sunny days per year.
legs and a spot
And so by now (if you have been keeping up with the story), we are in a state of semi-shock over what has been said thus far. There is a whole new side to our friend that we had no idea existed! Far from us to be judgmental, but this was information we were simply not prepared for. Needless to say, we had to top off our drinks, and make them doubles by now. So, the story continues… Bonnie then said that it didn’t take much cajoling on Waverley’s part to get her to join him. He probably figured that she was getting back at her sister and frankly it was all the same to him. Whether out of spite or not, or who was using who was totally irrelevant at this point. That they got together was all he wanted.
and approaches me, all squinting and slow.
Mohammad Salman Hamdani, 23, New York, N.Y.
“Yes ma’am, no thank you. I just had to go and buy one.”
I’m your most humble subject,
Can anyone get past the ranting of the Reformists and challenge their wreckage of the national assets? Joe Hockey has had a small go at the banks on that theme and even he can't beat the bullshit down. The fact that millions agree with him doesn't matter a damn. It's regarded as a quaint proof of the ignorance of the masses who don't know well enough to unquestioningly worship Reform.
Malcolm X: Always, Always, A Man With A Plan.
Raziel reveals to Elora that he has been waiting centuries for her. Their relationship is wonderful until Raziel mysteriously disappears. Elora searches all over for him to no avail. She then suffers another brutal attack from the invisible creature. Elora believes that the Nephilim are responsible for his disappearance. She tries to convince Barachiel, an archangel, that they do indeed exist. He is reluctant to believe her, having never seen proof that they are real. Elora accidentally meets Lucifer and is convinced that he isn’t as bad as his reputation. She believes that he may be able to help her. Can Elora find out who/what her assailant is? Will she find Raziel before it will be too late?
But as i finally found, your words were an illusion:
The last two weeks have been North's Lowlands festival and once again I've been rediscovering classics and discovering brilliant new beers. Yes the inclusion of some Dutch beers does point towards a lessening of the Belgian influence in the bar but what we stock regularly and during the festival is unrivalled in quality and complexity. Great Belgian bottled beer still holds pride of place in the first fridge and is the biggest selling bottled beer range we have. The likes of Struise, De La Senne, De Dolle, De Ranke, the Trappists, produce beers brimming over with brilliant complexity.
After therapy it was time to do some Christmas shopping for my spouse and so it was off to Kohl's. It was so very interesting to me how innocuous I was and how comfortable it was to shop that evening. More than one sales associate approached me and we began multiple conversations about everything... from travel to living in New Hampshire and numbers of other subjects. My best guess from the body language was that they were convinced I was natal female until the points where I spoke. For them, discovering the variance was a positive thing and it led immediately to their wanting to talk with me even more.
As I basked in the glow of you
On Cicero Avenue, William and Jane pick up an 88-year old hitchhiker named George Morrison (William introduces himself as "William White"). Morrison claims he ran away from home even though his "daughter" begged him not to. He proceeds to tell William and Jane some highly unlikely stories, among them a tale that he fought in the Spanish-American War at San Juan Hill and that Colonel Theodore Roosevelt told him to "Beat that drum, boy, beat it like hell." He also claims he also fought in World War I at St. Mihiel, and that he comes from Point Pleasant, Ohio.
Speaking of which, I had my own mishap, but I didn’t even know it until after my performance. Ah, yes, I had my costume in for alterations the week before, but there was one “slight” problem with the bra top and apparently I terrified everyone in the front row of the audience when they thought my top would fall through the bottom of my top. Yeah, I won’t pretend I don’t have my share of costume malfunctions and make my own mistakes. It happens. It’s great it happened there though instead of the stage in Vegas this May. Better Janet saw than Tito! The offending costume is back in the shop *still* undergoing surgery as we speak. Would I go again, sure! Lots of sweet people and the event had a happy vibe. Nice vending too!
Nicky, thanks very much for having me on your brilliant blog. Yes, I have talked about the inspiration for Tall Story in several places already but today, I suddenly remembered something that I haven’t ever mentioned before.
(I once wrote a better blog post on the very subject but I apologize, I'm too tired and busy to go find it at the moment. I felt just these words were good enough to share now.)
And that has to count for something, right?
music fills my fingertips, i cannot pluck
the heart on Dad’s chest as big as his face.
How much strength do you want in your espresso? The stronger the flavor of the bean, the stronger your drink will be. The more the caffeine in the bean, the more the caffeine in the espresso. It is important to remember that espresso comes in shot sizes. If you want a more powerful drink, you cannot look at the coffee bean. You simply need to add an extra shot of espresso to your drink.
“What was right!?!?! Oh little brother, you got a lot to learn!!! Open your eyes!!! Master von Baren had something to do with Dad getting arrested and it was more than turning him in.”
He loves to throw me under the bus!
I know what you’re thinking. How is that inspirational? But honestly, my hair gets like that 99% of the time so when it’s untameable I always turn to Miss Juno Temple for some kind of inspiration of what to do because if she can rock it on the red carpet and at high end events – then I can rock it for Italian Cinema at 3 on Mondays.
They were disappointing. The sponge was uninteresting and there was a huge pile of glurpy icing on top which tasted too much of artificial flavouring. Maybe I’m getting picky, eating so much home-made cake these days. Luckily there were only three of us in that day to eat them so for the next day (and a different set of colleagues) I decided to make some muffins.
Yikes what a great turnout we had for the last challenge, thanks to all who entered and shown us some amazing projects !!!!!
The main goal of the meeting, with a presentation led by FCR's approachable Ashley Cotton, was to explain how the job recruitment process will work, involving outreach, job fairs, and interviews. Similar meetings will be held this week at other community boards in the area around the arena, as the hiring will focus in the areas of CBs 2, 3, 6, and 8.
So here is to love, happiness, light and peace
The Fourth Annual International Capsule Wardrobe Challenge drew contenders from across the globe.
holding onto my instruments of writing,
Gotta stop
” Vickie, Happy Pearl Harbor Day! Love, Grandma and Grandpa”
It is a very basic text about astronomy, rockets and the manned exploration of space. Simple illustrations include planetary surfaces, spacesuits, various launch vehicles and spaceships of the future. It is part of the "Paxton-Slade Picture-Story Books" series.
Others, though, felt the sit-in was inappropriate as Nienstedt is a prominent figure in the Catholic community and should be respected for his teaching of the Catholic beliefs.
I return to the ground its original music.
Most Eastern Cape towns, including East London and many of its suburbs, could have new names by the end of the year.
I also knew I wanted to do more. I wanted to be able to look at these pictures, the memories and all the journaling I did of these memories. I made a book, a lovely, lovely book from Blurb . So far I have our 2007 book in print. I am now working on our 2008 book when a get a little bit of free time here and there. I am almost finished with it (up to Halloween of 2008) and I cannot wait to order it. It feels like Christmas to me when these books arrive.
Deus Suds and soda B
Sluggish and serene, the sloth, found in the rainforests of South America, happens to have the same name as the Catholic vice. But sloths aren’t lazy. They’re just really, really slow.
- 6 green onions, finely chopped
But you know, I’m not even tired right now. HOME!! In like 5 hours or so. Man, I’m so excited.
I am two minds about this. On one hand, I am glad she is finding it fun! She likes performing and learning a new experience. She was overjoyed when she got through the auditions to play a part in the haunted house. Then she saw the costumes for the role two weeks ago, and she was thrilled as she always wanted to wear a bibik’s sarong kebaya.
Interesting, huh? I at least thought so.
Oh, and the pregnancy BS? Really? I simultaneously loved Peeta for it, and hate Collins, because it was so easily disproven. The Capitol easily could have done a blood test on her but oh ho, they don’t, just so they can get away with it… for now…
Some imaginative and well known chicken 65 speculations:
A very recent publication of material known from old is the book by Vincent W.J. van Gerven Oei and El-Shafie El-Guzuuli with an English and a Dongolese Nubian translation of the Old Nubian version of the St. Mina miracle, one of the first Old Nubian manuscripts found and presented to the public (Griffith 1913: 6-15).
2:21 pm. “Sheep breeders are the ultimate mad scientists. Crazy frankensheep.” I had no idea how carefully sheep breeders breed their sheep. They pay a lot of attention to which sheep are their best producers and make sure to breed the best together. Poor sheep. It’s all arranged marriages for them. Or rather, arranged assignations.
Love to all. Hug your kids, kiss your loved ones, put a smile on your dial.
Feeling restless
Today I just didn't feel "writerly." I thought what a horrible way to end this beautiful challenge. It shouldn't be this way I thought. I should feel more "writerly" shouldn't I??? I began to think I'm just not pushing myself enough and asked, "Am I just phoning it in?" Then I heard this song as I was running today and and I ran a bit harder, it summed up how I was feeling. All I can see sometimes is that blank page, I need to trust that if I "open the window" and "feel the rain," "drench myself in words unspoken" ideas and words will come. Some days they'll be good, but most days it will be dribble.
Be Nice to the Doctor’s Staff
The lings on the strings
That's all for today-I need to get back to my house guests. Please let me know what you think about it, you know I love to hear from you!
It is moments like today that just reinforce how awesome of a God I try to serve everyday. He shows me His Endless Mercy, even when I seem to take paths that would hinder my path to Him. He’s there to protect me of all dangers and evil. I feel so honored to know that such a God is in my life…and that He takes the time out of His Busy Schedule, to tend to me.
FLESH AND BLOOD IS..."A top-notch package from cover to cover loaded with unexpected surprises along the way, which unfortunately seems almost a lost art in the genre. Great gothic fun in the tradition of the best of the Hammer films."
Not the kind of love I feel for a sausage. Nor a pint of claret and WKD.
But was he real?
A number of people in the office have "encouraged" me to sign up for one of those online services that match you with a compatible person. I've literally now met three people who have married their online match.
At 61 years old, he was still a window washer and expected that he would be “laid out” in his white coveralls when he left this world too. Even when he was off duty his wardrobe was the same.
Apologies, readers, for the lack of a picture of my own - missed out on an opportunity there - just so busy DOING - I'm going to try to catch up this week though with words and pictures but here's what Jamie has to say on Growing Asparagus and a useful video on Preparing Asparagus
Dear Jesus, Thank You for the graces You bestowed upon the Blessed Virgin Mary and upon all of Your Angels and Saints. Amen.
Louisiana Women
Human Touch
Undetermined Future Posts, Part 2: Major Research Necessary
Since 1989, the 69-year-old has been at the controls of the museum's famous Lancaster — one of just two of the big Second World War bombers that can still fly.
Here's the 'lifting' of the felted leaf:
This did not happen.
Millers Falls is a little town tucked into the hills of western Mass, right by Millers River, which joins the Connecticut River on the north edge of the village. Element is in the heart of town, in the old Post Office. Millers Falls doesn't have a post office anymore; when the paper mill and tool foundry closed, the USPS consolidated post offices, and Millers Falls lost theirs. On the other hand, they gained a brewery. Element opened two years ago (they celebrated their anniversary just a few days before I visited), and they brewed 350 bbls. last year. Every beer is at least 9 days in primary, and two to three weeks aging, and they bottle-condition.
I realize this isn't a new call, but the recent push in the Archdiocese to boost grade schools comes to mind. Saying that your school is Catholic isn't enough. It must impart the Catholic faith, not an ersatz spirituality.
We left for St. George early Thursday morning. It was dark and rainy when we left Grand Terrace. I went with my parents, Sydney, Michael, Kaidee, Cole, and Paisley. Darian was coming up later with Chase, Garrett, and Chloe. Darian had to teach his class and the kids had their state testing.
Again, as at the C1 class, I felt awfully rushed during this exercise. I was just barely bringing things into focus with each entity when Betsy moved on to the next, and when she had us finish up, I was still trying to figure out what was going on with the Heat being. Yet, when we went around the circle and described our experiences, it turned out that some other students had received massive quantities of material in that short time. I was the only one who complained of feeling rushed.
I love it that I’m mostly unconcerned about what people think of me.
Once we are in His perfect will, we will need to reset our hearts towards His purposes instead of fulfilling our own desires and needs. Many a times, we forget that our home on earth is temporary and in God’s Kingdom is eternal. So what are we living for? We have to then: -
My vacation flashed before my eyes.
It's gonna happen and it's
The story is simple: a dog gets lost, adjusts to her new home, is found by her old owners, goes happily back home. Like so much of Chekhov’s best work, it has the pace and emotional range of real life: no great villains, no great heroes, everybody trying to do his or her best. Neither master is an abusive brute. The dog is a small but pleasant part of both their lives. The first master is a woodcarver. The second trains domestic animals for a small-time circus act. The woodcarver is a bit cheap with the food, and stamps his feet now and then, but, in his favor, he has a son, and his house smells like woodshavings and glue. The animal trainer is a happy Falstaffian guy with a genuine affection for animals, who chomps a cigar, probably drinks a bit too much, has the occasional fling, when he can manage it, with the less-pretty of the three acrobats.
1.- Click on the link below
There were scout groups from Petal, MS, Phenix City, AL, Marietta, GA and Jacksonville, FL also camping. Over 300 people total! I think we were the envy of the other groups -- we only had a 90 minute drive to the ship :-)
You have understood that all of these things mentioned were under the dispensation of the Law and had to do with Jews of the nation Israel. I must also remind you of what is clearly stated in Romans 6:14, “Ye are not under the law, but under grace.” Paul wrote that for it was part of that revelation God later gave to him.
its only me and my son buying things that we think and also know by now of what they may need…so i shouldnt feel ‘too bad” right?? nope.. God still pulls on me to go the extra mile…
Lark Rise by Flore Thompson Novelization of the author's childhood growing up in a very small, poor, rural community during the Victorian era in England. I had heard good things about this (and the two subsequent novels) online, and my local PBS station started showing the serialization made in England several years ago. I decided to read the first before watching the show (which is actually based on all three fictionalized memoirs by Thompson). While it's a very fast read, this first book has very little dialogue and is almost completely descriptive. While the people of Lark Rise seem resigned enough with their lot in life (they're not really happy, because they really have no experience of how things can be or were different elsewhere), I came away from it very happy that I live today. These people were extremely poor, and reading about their diet (or lack of much of one), the difficulty of just scraping by, and the general hard times of everyone in the village, I wondered how so many viewers of the television show could find it a wonderful escape and wistfully say they'd love to live then. I haven't watched the show yet, so maybe when you don't read about the one meal a day they ate, with just a tidbit of old bacon fat to flavor it and provide some protein, or the threadbare clothes, lack of daily comforts including sanitation, and all the other things we take for granted, it may seem an idealized way of life. Not to me.
Repeatedly, secretly, deliberately, and over a twenty year period.
In theory. I will reserve my right to celebrate after I see the re-written IEP. But, in the meantime, I am Cabbage Patching all over this damn house!
In a recent survey, the readers of AD largely opined that only the identitarian parties can prevent the annihilation of the European culture, and that even the Church and the community institutions are powerless against it. What factors have contributed to a growing perception that traditional European institutions lack effective responses to address our current cultural and ethnic reversal?
I asked him what would become of Sweden.
2) Answer the questions that come with the award.
How does Isaiah describe the Messiah? How does Isaiah’s description contrast with the powerful military conqueror the people in Jesus’ day were expecting?
they had me at amy butler.
Since she didn't take to motherhood I suppose it was unrealistic of us to think she would be interested in being a grandmother, which she decidedly was not. She didn't even want them to call her any of the variations of grandmother. They were to call her by her middle name, Lou. So, of course I, in my perversity, instructed my children to call her
Finally I am pulling out my finger. Here are this years ferrero rocher “hats”. This time Robin shaped. They are similar to the puds I made last year and they are all free to you to use. All the designs are on my shelf but robin is here.
Julien waited, breathing, seeing Paris; seeing Vincent and his mother look up out of their second-floor window at a clear blue sky. He waited until the news ended, until they had read a psalm that said The Lord has delivered.
It took me about 2 months of three Netflix DVDs at a time but I’ve seen every episode and every movie. I’m terrified to think that this classifies me as a ‘Trekie,’ but, for the record, I own absolutely no Trek memorabilia (don’t ask about Indiana Jones.)
Recently I decided to wear one of my favourite t-shirts to work.
26: 3:05-3:10 – Copley
Why is it incumbent on the BBC to ‘remain impartial’ (as the BBC itself puts it)? Is Al Jazeera impartial about Islam or its views? Is Iran’s Press TV impartial about Islam? Are any Islamic/Muslim sources of knowledge and information impartial? That’s because it is damn well hard to be impartial without making a fool of yourself. In any case, the BBC is so very PARTIAL that it has jettisoned symbols which go back over a thousand years. They have been very partial in their bowing down to the endless demands of Muslims.
II. Second visual text is taken from the documentary Debtocracy by Katerina Kitidi and Aris Hatzistefanou, who together with economist Samir Amin, philosopher Alain Badiou, sociologist and geographer David Harvey and other guests research the reasons for the crisis in Greece, while also showing how Latino American Ecuador stood up to the IMF and refused to acknowledge legitimacy to their enforced slavery.
5. Taste the burgoo for salt and pepper, adjust as needed, then ladle into heated soup bowls.
Now the thing about time is that time
The election massacre we got, oh and I've heard all the spin and even dished it out in many speeches myself, but the fact of the matter is our vote only went up because we stood three times as many candidates.
Sunday night I made the "Busy Woman's Chocolate Cake" and Monday morning I made "Johnny Cakes" for breakfast.
I only have about a month to go before this semester is over and I can't wait. As you can tell by my few posts this year compared to other years, my academic work has been on overdrive. Not only that, this semester is one of my toughest yet.
Thank you all for your wonderful "Leave" Summer entries - now why do those leaves look so gorgeous on cards and not scattered all over my yard? ;)
“I have no one,” Kathy said, “and I have to go first thing in the morning, but I’ll call around from the pay phone.”
I use it for sweet and savour dishes because I find sweet dishes already so sweet they tend not to need a sugar based pastry. Some ways I use this pastry are:
Now that I had both the sour cherry juice and mahlab, I wanted to provide a biscuity, cracker-like malt profile. To get this I decided to use a sizeable portion of dark munich malt and some light crystal malts. My last addition to the recipe was the sherry flor. I used this yeast last about a year ago in a biere de garde (Athos). Now I haven't done a formal tasting of the beer, but its quite interesting. It has a great nougat flavor with hints of licorice and apples and retained a nice malt profile. I'm hoping to get a similar result from the yeast this time, as I really think those yeast flavors would play very well with the cherries and mahlab.
** Tweet about this giveaway (counts as 2 entries) leave 2 separate comments.
Expect more questions, and more discussion, especially when FDNY & NYPD provide the reports requested by Borough Hall. However, the Borough Hall meetings are a shadow to the ESDC process, and the bigger question is whether the revised scope, and the subsequent Draft Environmental Impact Statement (DEIS), will address security and terrorism issues with the seriousness required.
Maybe what makes you so good at seeing the deficiencies in others is the fact you have so many of your own?
This is why I hate dating.
Masterson's Rye, released in the U.S. last summer, is made by Alberta Distillers Limited for the Sonoma, CA, firm. It will be made available in Canada sometime this year.
includes the capacity and ability to
But everyone makes those decisions. You have to change, or you die.
The young star is making himself, friends and family proud already..
- My cousin was over my shoulder the whole friggin time!
But relationship with God, with Jesus, is so much for than logical theology.
The jokes are flying now with everything from exaggerations to insults.
TGWD - Good thing they didn't call Buzz Aldrin.
Let it not be forgotten that it is not by means of war that states are rendered fit for the enjoyment of constitutional freedom; on the contrary, whilst terror and bloodshed reign in the land, involving men’s minds in the extremities of hopes and fears, there can be no process of thought, no education going on, by which alone can a people be prepared for the enjoyment of rational liberty.
The great thing about this project, is that you probably already have everything on hand. I dug through my fabric stash and grabbed any pink or red fabric that I could find. What makes this even more special, is that some of the fabric I used is from Lily's great grandmother.
Rolling Catalinas: You may choose to split your purchases into multiple transactions in order to utilize catalinas. You’d use the first catalina to pay for the second transaction; the second catalina to pay for the third transaction; and so on.
The Starter Kitchen by Callum Hann (2010 runner up of Masterchef Australia) is surprisingly a solid beginners cook book. It goes beyond most first cookbooks with over 60 inspiring recipes. It features typical classics like scrambled eggs, the perfect steak, roast chicken, spag bol, shepherd’s pie, chips, and vanilla panna cotta.
A few minutes later, I said, "Oooooh! I get it! The hat! Oh! That's why that guy called me a snow cat!" I had completely forgotten about my cat-eared hat.
Twelve musicians with absolute pitch (AP)/perfect pitch and a matched control group of twelve musicians without perfect pitch were studied. Volume and fibre numbers in some tracts in the left and right hemispheres of the brain were found to be significantly higher in the study subjects who had perfect pitch, but hyperconnectivity was not found all over the place; “Heightened connectivity among AP musicians appears to affect local structures specific to the temporal lobe.” Figure 4 in this paper strikingly shows the difference between the tracts of three groups of study subjects. This paper shows that people with perfect pitch appear to have greater connectivity in the white matter of parts of the temporal lobes that associate and perceive pitch. It looks to me as though greater connectivity in the left hemisphere might be more important regarding perfect pitch. I am not pretending to be a qualified scientist in interpreting this paper.
Nose: Very light.
In the end, though, only one of Bersih 2.0′s eight demands – the use of indelible ink – was approved by the BN-dominated PSC. Even this reform has been negated by Umno’s new legal amendments blocking the monitoring of indelible ink, repeat voters and phantom voters.
8. That sounds like a great idea. I should try that! What are some of your favorite books and authors?
After some harsh honesty & guilt,
This time, we're featuring the "Lemonade Mermaid" bedroom.
At that moment the lamp on the wall turned off, and then turned on, and repeated that twice. Charles observed this with a sudden concealed interest.
13. Edinburgh was home to Skye terrier Grey Friar’s Bobby, who captured the hearts of the nation by sitting on the grave of his dead owner for 14 years.
the image shows Snow White as created by
The mom and the old man,
What is the Saint for the Year Devotion? Here is my post on this from years past to clarify the matter. This is from the person that draws all of the saints. I don't draw the saints. I will merely pass on your name or screenname to her so that she will draw a saint for you. Also, I will pass on the name of any of your family or friends that would like to participate. This isn't superstition. St. Faustina did the same thing!
Confirmation update #4: Damaging winds / Hail and possible tornadoes in the Springfield MO immediate area — 50 miles or less:
Fast forward to now. The week before doing Dragon's Way, as it is encouraged, I think about the foods that I anticipate letting go. And savor them.
me, is more fundamental and therefore congruent with the so-called
I’ve seen the highs, the lows, and I know the pain
“But red is my favoritest color ever!”
Ras Mbisi isn’t alone among eco-lodges; others take the small-footprint efforts even farther. Manzie Omar Mangochie, the district commissioner of Mafia, said there is a conscious effort by the government to develop the tourism industry without overwhelming the island and its residents.
Births.
It should be a crime to be so handsome AND talented! Scot Meacham Wood, San Francisco based designer, is definitely one of my favorite designers/bloggers. His rooms are refreshing, colorful, personal, and sharply appointed.
On the front cover of every fitness magazine, weight loss and health magazine you will see a cover model with either ripped or well defined abdominal muscles. These muscles are judged to be a clear indication of a fit and healthy individual and are what many find attractive in a person. The problem arises when we see abdominal definition as being driven by hundreds of sit-ups and crunches which can be soul destroying when wanting to achieve the washboard stomach. There is however, a way to achieve this look without any abdominal crunches at all, and not a sip-up in sight.
I fear you catch not lover's heart.
Give thanks to him; bless his name!
Bit depth : 16 bits
Please keep the people of Alabama in your thoughts and prayers. As I write this, the death toll in Alabama has reached 64. We're extremely thankful that we didn't have any damage to our home as the tornado skirted around us. After the storm had passed, we went outside to find debris drifting down from the sky. Neighbors found receipts, paperwork, gas station cups, etc., from as far away as Tuscaloosa (an hour and a half away).
3/4-1 cup halved fresh or frozen cranberries
To differentiate him on the field, I ended up naming Irusk’s war dog Arman (Russian for ‘protective.’ It seemed apt), so that if I ever get the chance to field two war dogs in big games, I’ll know which one is Irusk’s, and which one belongs to my second Warcaster.
Today I want to share with you another Easter card, this is my last one for this year LOL……..I have used a one of my fave Easter stamps from Magnolia, I think she is from 2009 Collection……but she is such a sweetie with her little lamb. Gone with the lilacs again, loving these papers and shades at the moment :o)
he has scattered those who are proud in their inmost thoughts.
7:30 – 8:30 p.m.– Open Reading
For the buttercream filling
The rest is still unwritten
“See? I said I’d be right back. Now just one more stop, OK?”
Prep: Wash and dry the fresh Heirloom Tomato very carefully. Slice a good bread with a serrated knife on a cutting board. Toast or bake in oven with EVOO drizzled on it and bake on a baking sheet. Also use a cutting board to cut the tomato in thick slices with a serrated knife. Have extra virgin olive oil (EVOO) nearby as well as dried basil.
I *need* (want?) a nest, again. Love my community here, my support. Invaluable, especially now.
» 11/16 – Tampa, FL @ St. Pete Times Forum
I have to remind myself sometimes that teaching is, in fact, a great way to make a difference. Not in the “If I can only reach one child” sort of way, but in a more realistic, I want to teach ALL my students to love learning kind of way. Because education is the way out of most of life’s hardships. Donna Beegle worked for years to get herself and her children out of poverty, the road wasn’t easy, but she now has her PHD and works to help others out of the poverty cycle.
“Would you do it again?”
There were Pipe Majors and they were ROCKING 'Scotland the Brave'.
I used store bought fudge writing to do the very homemade writing (I am working on it give me time!) but you could easily whip up some chocolate ganache like this and drizzle it all over (I find it is too thick to write with)
Back home we undid our belts and lay around on sofas playing Tomb Raider and downloading a fine radio app for the ipad.
When there are too many things happening, or too much stuff around you, it distracts you from your goals and desires. This is the perfect time to do some spring cleaning (or fall cleaning) and prepare yourself for allowing the new into your life. Eliminate clutter from your surroundings as well as from your mind. Release all things that no longer serve your growth.
When you call someone a genius, what do you mean?
“Dean, what’re you doing?!”
Frank Rosolino (trombone), Franco D'Andrea (p),
The Irish Centre for Human Rights, National University of Ireland, Galway will host the 2012 Doctoral Seminar from Monday 30th April - Friday 4th May. This week provides PhD candidates an opportunity to present an area of their research to fellow students and experts in the field of international human rights law, international humanitarian law and international criminal law. The experts this year will be: Prof. Michael O'Flaherty, Prof. Suzannah Linton, Dr. David Keane and Prof. Koen De Feyter.
Wow I just realized that I have quite a collection!
Today was pajama day at "school" (mom's day out). This was Brent's first taste of pajama day and I was almost sure he was going to be the only child at school in normal clothing. I had told my husband last night what pair of pajamas I wanted Brent to wear to school: the least worn, still fits in all the right places, cute Hugh Hefner style. However, this morning, when I started to get Brent dressed, I explained to him that it was pajama day so he would get to wear pajamas to school! (Insert enthusiastic yay! here).
This is a must read for every Evernight fan of course, but this is definitely a book that people who haven't read Evernight can still read.
Well, this was one BIG issue with me since I couldn’t stand Baby #1 wrestling with the Lact-Aid. But this time around I learned a tip. Get one of those lactation bras where there is a triangle (my hubby calls them the butt-chaps bras because they look like those cowboy chaps with the whole for the bum). Stick the Lact-Aid in that space right at the middle and then run the tubing under the fabric that goes on top of your breast. This reduces the odds of it shifting around AND keeps you from having to use tape. Yes, the wrestling will still happen, but this helps.
Whereupon (good word) he laughed and stuck it into his pocket. “Finally caught on, did you?” he said.
Next time I will definitely layer this over a nude underwear coat.
Freezing is a great way to preserve lots of fresh chillies. I take a few out at a time, slice them thinly, put them in a small bowl and barely cover them with olive oil. They retain their colour and flavour and once in the oil, they will keep in the fridge for days, that's if they last that long!
Friday - Organic spaghetti with organic spinach spaghetti and organic tomato sauce
So I'm going to share the love with you, so you can amaze your friends and families with your culinary talents too.
Did you go to the Met Ball last night?
I would buy plane tickets on this sweet, springy day and I would whisk my surprised friend off to Paris.
90 grams cashewnuts/hazlenuts(optional but an absolutely delicious addition)
And yet--I hope you will not draw from this
Do you think I've made it better?
In such an environment, it is hardly surprising that the politicized, pseudo-scientific consensus behind the wave theory of gravity has struggled to keep the public largely unaware of competing theories explaining fall-down. But such theories do, in fact, exist, even if they have been shunted out of sight (not least due to media coverage that never questions the underlying assumptions behind this flawed theory or devotes equal time to its critics). Methodist preacher Alexander Wilford Hall proposed an intriguing alternative to gravity called “substantialism.” The theory argues that “gravity” and all other forces are actually substances, composed of particles smaller than the atoms comprising normal objects. Other theorists have speculated that objects, both organic and inorganic, are all made up of the same set of conscious, sub-atomic cells, and that universal laws of attraction can be explained by these cells desperately seeking out their personal twin cell-mate in every other object.
Leah was a divorced mother of three, struggling to work part time, raise her children and earn a teaching credential. I met her in an English Literature class as we wrestled with the meaning of Beowulf. We decided to stop for coffee after class one night, both aware that extending the night’s activities would extract a hard price, given the responsibilities we faced the next day. The initial chemistry that drew us together was strong, however, and it turned out that Leah and I had many things in common – our children, our love of learning and deep thought about life, plus some similar childhood issues.
Everything we tried was perfectly cooked and delicious, and we really loved the new seasonings and wood-fire grilled taste. Dan’s favorite dishes were the succulent Prime Rib, which was perfectly cooked, and the Wood-Fire Grilled Ribeye, which was juicy and extremely flavorful. I loved the Outback Special Signature Steaks, both classic and wood-fire grilled flavors. For dessert, we tried Classic Cheesecake and Carrot Cake, and got a very special treat, a sample of the new and amazingly delicious Chocolate Waffle, which is also made from scratch. Outback’s décor has also been changed with an updated and very classy look. We had a wonderful time, and now we like Outback even more after trying the new options.
The boy’s collection from Stacy Adams is equally fascinating and your young lad will love to wear them. The Child’s paragon is a unique style of shoes which is strong and durable and is great for walking or hiking. It is basically a boy’s casual boot that comes with smooth uppers and a non-leather sole. It is mainly available in the colour black. Your child can pair it up with jeans or comfortable trousers whichever is suitable for him.
The strangest question in this solution is that no one asked for it. In fact, once it was announced, it faced strong criticism from all the sectors evolved in the current litigation procedures.
They find themselves lost in a maze full of trap-doors, dead-ends, and odd rooms to camp out in that don’t fit so they wander the long corridors within themselves lost in empty vacuous feelings… desolate… because that is how the Players of the God-Game want it… to lure them in deeper until there’s no turning back like Plato’s Cave.
I have featured my statement Chanel boucle jacket a few times in my blog, but I have not done an outfit post until now. The jacket is from the 1997 collection and is a gorgeous mix of lemon and lime sorbet, so perfect for this coming season.
Last month’s hearing on the amendment was a virtual love fest. All but two witnesses supported it as-is.
Forming a path across my heart
Hi, my name is Jennie Harper. I live in North Carolina with my husband and our three precious children. I am thankful for my role as a child of God, wife, mom, home-school teacher, and pastor’s wife. My husband and I have been in full- time Christian service from the very beginning of our marriage and the Lord has taught us so much in those 18 years. I was first introduced to stamping in 1999, and since 2005 have applied myself to learning new techniques, styles and found a love for creating cards to encourage others. I enjoy combining my faith and stamping and pray I can inspire others as well. Besides paper crafting, I also enjoy reading, cooking/baking, hiking and spending time with my family which lately is LOTS of Little League baseball. One of my favorite verses in Scripture is Isaiah 26:3, “Thou wilt keep him in perfect peace, whose mind is stayed on thee; because he trusteth in thee.” In our years of serving Him, we have seen this exemplified time and again as those near and dear to us have weathered the storms of life. I know the Lord wants us to use of talents and abilities for Him and I would like to thank Korin for this opportunity to be the May guest designer for Sweet 'n Sassy Stamps.
With folded arms and steady eyes,
After two passes through the town of Auvers sur Oise with my hiking group which offered little time to soak up the history of Vincent Van Gogh's final days there, I finally made the time to go back in early May. With perfect weather and a great group of touring companions, it was certainly a day to remember. And it's one that anyone visiting Paris can easily repeat themselves via commuter train from Gare du Nord in about 40 minutes. There's just one change in Valmondois or you can get off in Méry sur Oise and walk about 2.5 kilometers down the hill and across the river to Auvers.
Now, on with our day...
The truth is, I don't know much about Crown Heights history either. As the students learn, I will learn too. In the upcoming months, Floyya, Monica, Treverlyn, Quanaisha and I will satisfy our collective curiosity. We will interview 60 people who have lived in Crown Heights for over 15 years. We will donate these interviews to Brooklyn Historical Society’s oral history collection and share parts of these interviews at a community listening event in May – a celebration of the 25th Anniversary of Crow Hill Community Association.
The next step for this room is to find some fabric that I can turn into curtains (they'll also go in the living room so I need a bunch of fabric at a discounted price). I'm going searching this weekend. Wish me luck!
If you have purchased a Wii game console one of the top ways to save money is to rip them. If you wish to know how to copy Wii games, this can be accomplished by utilizing a software program that burns replicas of your original games for backup and simultaneously, decrypts them. Many people think that it is not legal to do this; however, this could not be further from fact. It is not only lawful, but highly recommended.
Something small, something light.
9. Foreigners may have no protests; no demonstrations, no waving of a foreign flag, no political organizing, no bad-mouthing our president or his policies. These will lead to deportation.
02 - Gator Country 06:17
I received such lovely comments on my last post, and appreciate all of them so much.
butter. Add peppers, onions, and celery. Saute for
today ? Another album by le Grand Maître Franco with 10
I have honest dough on a Gulf bungalow
Despite the many trends around this summer there is one particular theme that rears it's fashionable head every spring and makes the perfect addition for anybody who is looking to either create or expand on an existing summer capsule collection.
George Clooney was arrested, along with other protesters, today in front of Sudan’s embassy in Washington D.C. He had joined some congressmen, activists, civil rights leaders and members of the Sudanese community to protest human rights violations in the South Kordofan and Blue Nile states of Sudan and the Bashir government’s blocking of aid to the civilian population.
For the dreams I have of you
9th April- The Unicorn, Camden, London, UK (with Stubb, Trippy Wicked, Grifter)
Well, great.
Aside: Does anyone else find An Na's romanization of Korean strange? I mean, I'm not nitpicking the way she spells out the words into English letters since I'm not the most familiar with the romanization systems for the Korean language. I just find her insertion of a hyphen in between every syllable jarring. It makes reading the romanized Korean sound stilted and stiff, and Korean doesn't really sound like that, imo. I'm speaking as a person who doesn't speak Korean personally and mostly hears the language through friends or kdramas or just people talking in public areas, FYI. (Opinions of Korean speakers are welcome.)
Small colony - 1d4
card and fold it in half to form a landscape card. I then added 2 different
8) Would you add any advantages to the list for relational mathematics?
He heard the wind chimes tinkle and come to life with the warm afternoon breeze. They were soft at first, rousing him fully from his late afternoon nap and then louder and more persistent refusing to be ignored. “Damn the day I ever hung those damn things,” he muttered softly. Words to fill the silent room not intended to be heard by anyone else. The truth was that day had been a perfect day. He never heard the wind chimes’ melody without being reminded of how perfect it had been. He rubbed his face, not wanting to relive the memory that he knew was coming.
Thirty-five years ago, inspired by the writings of Georgette Heyer, and little more than fresh out of high school, I wrote a Regency Romance novel entitled, A Very Merry Chase, which I finally published last year. Then and now history in all it’s forms was my first love–especially women’s history. These days I have two degrees in history; however a graduate degree in women’s studies was not an option at the university where I received my MA so I had to make do with a more generalized degree. Thus, in every class I made up for the lack by researching the condition of women in each age that I studied. I have always been fascinated by women’s history, so I thought I would start sharing some of the lost treasures that I uncover... and besides the truth of the matter is, most of women’s history was never written, and if was written it was downplayed, so in many cases our only real source of insight into a woman’s station in life were stories and women's journal articles written by men, and sometimes women, for upper class ladies to read. I believe that most people have curious minds and like glimpses of how the world was, and how things were perceived in the past. I firmly believe in the idea that we must remember history in order to learn from it, grow and hopefully cut down on the number of stupid mistakes that random impulse and intellectual curiosity and greed and a thousand other human motivators lead us to make.
Anne has much of importance to say in this video. I hope you enjoy her as much as I have.
March 18 The Blue Door, Oklahoma City OK acoustic duo
As you may recall, the private militias which had formed in the hinterland for mutual defense against that first major national tax were labeled as treasonous and enemies of the state. And the rest of the nation just lapped that rationale up. Just as the North lapped up a similar labeling of the breakaway South. And just as contemporary citizens lap up the idea that militia types are somehow dangerous to law and order as more than half of them wait for their government checks. See the pattern?
1/4 cup Splenda or other sugar substitute (look on the web for conversion charts)
Please let me know if you use this activity in your classroom. I would love to know how it turns out for you. :)
Yes, the 33 year-old police Lt. was also a medic in Vietnam. After reading that part, I had to reread it. Then I went back to the beginning to verify his age. Then I went to the cover page to look for the publication date. 1988. Subtract a dozen years on the police force=1976. *shakes head*
Thanksgiving comes ONCE a year. My little family is only together
Of the Moon,
FOLLOW THESE LINKS AND PURCHASE SOME ACHERON MERCHANDISE:
Then what do we do with water baptism? It was under the Law a requirement for personal salvation. From Mark 16:16 the words of Christ were, “He that believeth and is baptised shall be saved.” That is why Peter preached in Acts 2:38, “Repent and be baptised every one of you…for the remission of sins.” But that was again directed to Israel and commands of the Mosaic Law. If water washed our sins away what would be the need for the blood of Christ?
The first concert was to take place that evening, January 28. “To-night the ‘lights’ have it,” commented Dwight. “A programme light indeed! (and if we may be pardoned the suggestion) a little too closely modelled upon Jullien’s programmes, not to endanger the Germania prestige. But we are glad to see that good overtures and parts of symphonies are not excluded.” He anticipated that the “lights” would outnumber “the rival party” at upcoming concerts, and that the Germanians’ revised plan would “test effectually the relative strength of parties in this matter.”
The casting of blacks in ludicrously incongruous roles is too much to take…. for example, a black actor as the Norse god Thor, or almost as bad, a black actress as Guinevere. And yet many people see nothing weird or dissonant in this. Read comments or reviews of the Thor movie, and note how very few people even mention the incongruity in the casting.
Tracy - Mad about Bags
I’ve not given up on life, I’ve simply let go
“Bring it down to the garage. Let’s see if we can get it on the boat,” he said.
Slow poison… very effective…. Leaves no trace
Marion - Ivory Size 6
The EU wants new legislation in place by 2016, resulting in the UK having to collect 45 tonnes of e-waste for every 100 tonnes of e-goods put on sale the three years previously. This law will only really affect retailers; however, it may lead to better deals for those looking to dispose of small electrical goods.
1. The distal toe.
First of all, every one of the crystals I have given out both last year and this year are all infused with the accelerated energy process that is housed in my personal crystal. So whatever is taking place on earth, is amplified by those connected to the crystalline energy infused with…. god only knows what. I sure am not going to pretend to know here!! But the one thing I know (and see) is the linkage of energy between all the crystals given out and the ones that I still have.
* The Hunger Games, odds are I sorta kind love this movie. A smart adaptation of the books makes for one pleasing blockbuster.
-Beau got a new phone today and he's driving me crazy with it. We do not need this much technology in our lives! I tend to live by the mantra, just because you can, doesn't mean you should. In all things really...I mean, this world is seriously getting out of control. What happened to the simple things in life? I won't even get started on that tonight but I could. Maybe another day.
Subtitle: It's not the height that counts, right?
I Spy with my little eye a blog that has been going for six months. So, let's party! I'm giving away a set of I Spy charms from my Two Bits Patches online store. The winner can chose any one of the 6.5 inch charm packs. There are fourteen different sets to choose from including mixed I Spy charms, cats, butterflies, Australiana, and boys or girls.
Yes and no! I can be really sarcastic at times but I am not always sarcastic.
and that’s top-shelf booze.
1) Graphic Novel – Being written as a script, as I am most familiar with that format.
Today, day two of our anniversary celebration, H took me horseback riding in Galveston. I have been wanting to go horseback riding since I moved here five years ago so H finally planned it! It was so much fun! The company is S-n-G Horseback Riding, for anyone interested.
Whether standing or walking, seated or lying down
velvet frogs croak silently while above
You can print this out and mail it to friends who don't have email to join the session. You can also read this to people over the phone if they don't have email and they'll get the energy when they use their intention to join.
I admit that back in the early ’70s . . .
In the beginning was the Word, and the Word was with God, and the Word was God. He was in the beginning with God. All things were made through him, and without him was not any thing made that was made. John 1:1-3
so an hour later!
Another shout out goes to one of my new favorite shows on television, Scandal. In the show, the main character, played by Kerry Washington, is dealing with a relationship/affair she had with the White President of the United States, who clearly is in love with her. Very interesting indeed.
I love it that Kreed has such a strong sense of who he is. I hope and pray that he will always recognize who he is as a son of God and remain strong in his convictions.
The new units are lower down because um. because the fitters don't like ladders. Or green things.
Snobbery perhaps? I'm not sure. Although I still think I might have tried it over the Greedy King pub though, for Brewery and proximity to the market/theme park reasons. Anyway, none of this needed matter as I already knew, that, despite probably never having been in the GBG, the pub had a brewery, Leila Cottage, and sold its own brewed beers. So I was really happy to be getting the chance to visit, since I'd also heard you couldn't buy the beers anywhere else.
The capsule to get me through 5,000 words.
“Illustrious– I mean, Moskk… Contrary to that Knight you just slayed, we have not come here for your “Great Treasure”" Sir Elm explains.
Limitless undying love which shines around me like a million suns
I am thrilled to know that I am the “apple” of God’s eye. As much as I love Joshlyn, I know that God loves me even more. He hears me when I pray. He shows me his “marvelous loving-kindness.” He has saved me from death with the sacrifice of His Son, Jesus. He gives me protection under the “shadow of His wings.”
That's what Brooklyn Eagle paperboy Jimmy Bozart did, back in the good old days of the 20th century, when the Soviet Union was our enemy. Bozart was collecting his subscription money one evening in 1953 in Brownsville, Brooklyn, when he came upon a strange coin. Upon dropping the nickel on the ground, it split open, and inside was contained a small piece of paper with some sort of numerical code on it. Rather than writing it off as a curiosity, he took it to the police, who in turn gave it to the feds. With the help of an ex-KGB man who had defected to the U.S., they were able to crack the code, as well as bust a Soviet spy operating right here in Brooklyn, Rudolf Abel. Abel had kept a studio right on Fulton Street in Downtown Brooklyn.
It is also pointed out that the 14th Amendment does not alter the definition or supersede the meaning of Natural Born. It is pointed out that lower court rulings do not conflict with the Supreme Court opinion nor do they over rule the Supreme Court Minor vs Happersett opinion.
RTD refers to this Doctor as the Clint Eastwood Doctor. World weary, traumatized, angry Doctor redeemed by a wide-eyed, cheerful companion.
The man I performed CPR on returned to our facility yesterday.
“Fuck you, Dul,” I say. “We’ll be over.”
My mother was referred to the provincial hospital in Bethlehem to have biopsies done on lumps found in her breasts in order to determine whether it is cancerous or benign. As an old Afrikaner lady, she was treated with the utmost immoral staff members at the hospital. Upon arriving, she went to admissions. She explained to the officials her reason for being there and presented he reference letter from the specialist. The official diminutively asked my mother: “What must I do with this?”, upon which she then responded that she unfortunately did not know as she was told to present this letter when signing into the hospital. With an intense dreadful attitude, she was referred to casualties in a derogative manner. When arriving at casualties, the queue was extremely long and no white person in sight amongst the multiple patients. Eventually, after a few hours, when attention was given to her, she was told that she did not belong there and should return to the admissions office. She returned to the office and remained there for yet a long period. As it was here turn to be admitted, the official on duty blatantly turned her back on my mother and just walked away without any indication whether she would return or not. My mother stood for several minutes after which the frowned-faced-official returned and started attending to other people out of the queue even though my mother was first in line. The total lack of respect, and mocking “entertainment” of these officials with a hate glare in their eyes got the better of my unfortunate mother, and she had no alternative but to leave the hospital without receiving the medical care as stated in our constitution. My mother potentially has a life-threatening disease, and she was “forced” to leave the hospital by a method of derogative mannerisms by people who are suppose to provide loving and tender care to the sick.
Was going thru my blog posts today and that one blogpost, a few weeks ago was soooo long, my gosch i was suprised that some of you had even read thru it al,lol. Oke, i feel that im picking up a subject again, blogposting, i could go on and on about that, especially blogger, and how he is misbehaving. so i better stop.
“Why guard a door to a dead end corridor?” he thought.
Last year, I learned a LOT about myself as a person, and about what type of person I wanted to be. I realized that you don't get to decide when you're a grownup...it happens without your permission. I learned to accept that things can't always be perfect, that sometimes you only get one shot at something, and that it's OK to fail. Most importantly, I learned that you are a collection of your behavior, not what you resolve to be or how you think of yourself...but by what you do, what you say, and what you are.
Wheels car. The child was
It was wonderful.
Memories that had faded
Now it's time to turn my thinking back to the Farmer's Wife QAL...
For comic relief, the group shoehorns in two songs from Joe Walsh, one of which, "Last Good Time in Town," boasts a fetching little bass line.
I didn't read the websites through, I admit, because I felt that they were making very unsolid claims that I had to check out. I started by checking out what acidosis is, and found out that it's "a condition in which there is too much acid in the body fluids", according to the U.S. National Library of Medicine. It can be classified as respiratory or metabolic acidosis. Since the first one is completely related to lungs and chest problems, I discarded it a went with metabolic acidosis.
held me with ardent composure
“Are you the author of Gridley Quayle?”
Portrait photo looking at the junction of the glass cone and adjacent works buildings. Behind the red door marked 'KEEP CLEAR' is the entrance of the tunnel to the glass cone furnace hearth and ashpit.
I received an extra special parcel in the post recently. You see I have been on a serious yarn diet for the past month or so, which has meant far less mail of the yarn type. But in the past week I received a yarn surprise that has most certainly made up for the lack of yarn parcels. Do you want to see?
And the only way to remove the fluoride is to remove all of the other healthy minerals in the water too. Whereas the chlorine is easy to remove with a simple filter which would leave most of the beneficial minerals in our pristine drinking water could still remain.
Of course, since we have two doors, I had to make two wreaths. I made them both with the same items, just configured them slightly differently so they wouldn’t be identical.
Ya know what? It may be a gloomy day today, but I feel 100% better than I did yesterday. And I KNOW it's because of the exercise. Stinkin' exercise. Why must it be SO hard to make ourselves do, when it CLEARLY does so much for us beyond physical well being?? Blergh.
We’ve all heard it: “Money makes the world go ’round” but I question; is that really so?
Round 2: Ch 3. 2 dc in each dc around. Join with sl st to top ch of ch 3.
Family and friends are invited to the after party, each adult $30 for a ticket, children eat free.
we painted the shutters black first. and we love them.
-Mallory L. Grismer
Boots: vintage
There was a slight delay when I asked if he was still enjoying refereeing.
So, learning is using, and using is learning. That much we know. But what are the implications of a more ‘embodied’ view of learning? Is there a case for incorporating more kinaesthetic practices? For reviving Total Physical Response, even? And to what extent, as teachers, are we conscious of the way that ‘body language’ helps in the co-construction of learning?
At first you will waste slightly more than you used to because you will go out and buy more to fit in with what you have. You needn't do this. If you work with what you have instead of buying more (I conceed to things like meat, lentiles, legumes, beans, bread, etc) you will slowly reduce your waste to nearly nothing. For preserving, remember you will most likely be working with small amounts so jarring is not practical. However, there are neat things like preserving in oil, which requires little prep and can be added to as you get more - as with mushrooms. If you have a container of preserved mushrooms, you simply add more mushrooms and flavourings to your desires and then fill over the top with more oil. Lemons can be preserved with salt. Eggplant and zucchini can both be grated on a mandolin and dried for an almost chip-like snack that'll keep a week or two in the pantry. Admittedly, I've eaten some after a few months back there. They were delicious. Making ice cream is also an excellent way to preserve food and, bonus, you have an excuse to make and eat ice cream.
The image above shows I went 3.00 miles in 38 minutes and 12 seconds. 11:50 is the pace, but you know its not the average pace, it just popped up for a second. When you are running it shows your pace at the time there.
This letter in cuneiform was sent to the King of Lagash, to tell him his son died in battle (about 2400 BCE) (source Wikipedia). A librarian at the Philadelphia Library Rare Books Department once brought out such a tablet carefully preserved in a tiny box. Parts of this tablet had crumbled to dust, for people once touched the tablet. Perhaps paper books will be like that one day, preserved in museums, accessible only online.
I do not think black men date white women because they are better, or less difficult, or whatever other excuse has been thrown out there. It has more to do with the type of personality they are looking for. If they find that in a woman who happens to be white, so be it… but they shouldn’t bash the women who look like them in the process. Even though my bestie will not date a white man under any circumstances, I have never heard her put them down or justify dating black men by saying they are better in some way or less this or that than white men.
He was defeated in 1888, partially due to angering the Irish community because he refused to attend the St Patricks Day Parade. (Hewitt tended to be of a more nativist stripe; among other demands, he required all immigrants take a literacy test.)
Well, I have more spool blocks completed. Still have 9 more to make – 5 for the swap and 3 more for my friends. The extra 3 are going to be selvage thread.
I will admit that my greatest extravagances are flowers and scented candles.
This broader set of interests means that young Christians are often very conservative on the matter of abortion, for instance, but don’t vote on that single issue, King said. They might urge a young woman not to have an abortion, but then question whether the church is prepared to support her and her child.
G is for favorite Game: Scrabble
like showers on new grass,
"What about all the games you've played and all of your data," you wonder? Well, I could transfer the data from the red 3DS to the more-appropriately-colored one. That means all the completed puzzle murals, game player data, Miis, everything, would all get to move to the prettier, vastly superior 3DS.
2096.***E-VI/30/2001. On Daniel Ellsberg’s vulnerablity because of his Pentagon Papers conduct. (Incorporated in Item B-14 (Projected), above, Letter C-17.)
Anastasia has other great insights into gardening. See the chapter “Advice from Anastasis: The Seed as Physician” pages 77-80 in the book Anastasia: The Ringing Cedars Series Book 1
The inscription by the artist reads:
But, for me, and I’m sure many others, much of travel does not consist of doing those things we like, largely because we often travel with other people who have different preferences than us. Despite my desire to make food the central part of my European travels, I was eating less than a quarter of the time.* Even when my preferences did align with my fellow travelers regarding what to do, they often did not align on how long to do it. Generally, people have an incentive not to be selfish, so frequently two travelers may stay in a museum longer than either prefers because they each think the other isn’t yet ready to leave. Of course, there are also a good deal of “transaction costs” of traveling—going through the airport, waiting on lines, staying in hostels—which, when combined with the preference problem, means that, for most people, there is a significant part of traveling that is unpleasant.
Unfortunately, like with most things in our society, people have taken something that can be used for good and used it for their own selfish vices. Misuse and abuse driven by greed has turned what should be used for constructive purposes into something destructive.
I know I’m skipping a day here but it’s not because I didn’t take a picture yesterday, I did, but I’m not uploading it. So, moving on…
About once a month: 13 (23%)
It was a light touch, but a true one. Because, if anything, learning about the human fingerprints all over the Old Testament has freed me to appreciate God’s message in the text more. At the beginning of class, you might recall, I described the OT as a “crazy uncle” who embarrasses me in public and for whom I have to apologize later.
--- Jerome K. Jerome
4. Filing your return more than 60 days after the due date or the extended due date, minimum penalty is the smaller of $135 or 100 percent of the unpaid tax.
3.) I am half Spanish but I can't speak Spanish, I can only swear in Spanish.
There are some things you should know about me. First, know that I do not always behave in a “socially acceptable” way. This is because, to me, the socially acceptable way is just flat damn stupid, and designed to protect people from the truth.
I know I won't get credit for all times I bit my tongue or took "contrary action" in the name of being a good parent. Your future therapist should know that I actively self-censored myself in the majority of my day-to-day interactions with you and regularly did the opposite of what my inner voice wanted. It wasn't easy!
It might, as I explain below, turn out that Mr Sheridan’s decision to dispense with Counsel and to act for himself could let Mr Coulson off a hook he might otherwise have been on.
that as he
4. Sam Waterston (Gore Vidal’s Lincoln, 1988; The Civil War, 1990)
“Most artists hit upon something that sells, and then they start doing the same thing over and over again,” Anderson said. “Arthur Kraft was not that way. If he hit upon something successful, it was, ‘OK, fine, but I’m going to do something different.’ “But he never really gave up surrealism, the way I look at it. It was always part of Arthur. But it was hidden sometimes by another technique or painting style.”
B xxx
Link your creations below by Sunday, September 12th to play along. Winner and Tea Time Terrific Top Three will be announced Monday, September 13th. We will have an all-new challenge for you to play along with on the 13th as well, so please come back and visit with us again for another chance to win!
Oct 2nd: World Beer Festival, Durham Bulls Athletic Park, Durham, N.C.
Arthur won the initiative and we ended up with woods in the corners and a large brush area just of centre of the battle field, along with a swamp. I place my camp nicely between the swamp and the woods, with my trusty mob of Thralls protecting it. I then deployed from my right flank, touching the right edge of the table and spanning across. Knowing I’d be out manoeuvred by all the cavalry in the Arab army, I planed to fight on only two fronts if possible.
Just before he left, he said to his wife: By Allah, you are forbidden to me until I rescue this sister. He conquered three cities along the way, before he even got to the place where the sister was captured. For one entire year he fought. For one entire year, he took an army of 60,000 mujahideen. He conquered three cities, turned them completely upside down, and got all of the booty. When he reached the gates of the area where the sister was in captivity, he said he would offer them money, all the booty that they got from these three cities, in exchange for this one sister. The messenger went and he took it to the king.
On Tuesday, I was lucky enough to spend a day with Sue Harrison, a local textile printing artist. As you may already know, getting an insight into printing my own fabrics was on my new year resolution list, so you can imagine how excited I was about this!
I spend the rest of the day feeling the squelch between my toes as I walk and the sting of diseased, probably infected with batshit wounds as anyone brushes past me.
Bling from an old necklace
Seriously, Mr. Carney, how does a President fail to get even a single Representative of his own party to stand up for his budget proposal? Why can't a President in the lead get his own Senate Majority Leader to put a budget up for a vote, even if simply to get the Republicans on record as voting against it? How is responsible leadership going more than 1000 days without a budget for the government at all?
Janel Torkington is here for her third reading. She is currently studying the science of Being In The Right Place At The Right Time, with a creative minor in Living In The Here And Now.
golden locks bound in Gillikin braids
A Harvard study has also shown that women who regularly drink coffee also have a 15% lower risk of experiencing depression. Interestingly enough, the study also suggested that women who drank more than four cups of coffee a day had an even lower probability of ever developing depression.
passalong peach iris from Annie In Austin
Above the sky of the sertão, a bleak, weary sun shines down and bleaches the soil to the color of bone. A few scant, leafless trees jet rebelliously from the ground only to be embalmed by the shimmering heat. In this place, located in the Northeastern reaches of Brazil, the black blood of African slaves and Mulattos is diluted by whites and the fossils of Amerindian society. Theirs is a desperate feudal society ruled by a tiny class of white land owners wielding dictatorial powers. On the sertão, cattle form the lifeblood of society and prove to be the only separation between sustenance and starvation. Is it any wonder, then, that a man is willing to die and kill for his cattle? That is how we find ranch hand Manuel at the beginning of Glauber Rocha’s Black God, White Devil. When his boss tries to cheat him of his cattle after four of his herd die of snake bites, Manuel strikes back, killing him. And so, Manuel, his wife Rosa, and their newborn child must flee. Theirs will be a deadly and bizarre journey of mythic and mystical proportions in Glauber Rocha’s Black God, White Devil.
Peeved: No, thanks.
Because, this is where the blood is shed; where the race is (most often) lost… or won… where the hell-hounds breathe down the neck of a potential victor… a few more kilometers, one more climb (the Bosberg) and twelve more rolling kilometers and God-like status is assured.
When Danny told me he was getting married, I congratulated him with a warm smile.
Historical Archive
Since my last QuickTake for Mother’s Day proved to be more effective at producing Mom tears than all of my past cards put together, I thought I’d do another in anticipation of Father’s Day. But first I’d like to share a few quick observations about the importance of fathers in general.
I have a lot more sympathy for folks living with diabetes. Our industrialized culture eats sugary, refined carbohydrates in large quantities at most meals. It would be challenging to maintain blood sugar long term without feeling left out.
( because I just KNOW you'd rather be reading about my boobs)
There are several products, like After Bite, which relieve the itch. If you apply it early, it'll lessen the effects.
One last thing. On Simon Clark’s blog, timbone wrote the words of ”You’ve Got To Be Carefully Taught” from the musical South Pacific:
FUCKING SERIOUSLY
In late 50’s and early 60’s, film magazines were not allowed in respectable homes to protect kids like me from the bad influence of the movies. The only opportunity to flip through a film magazine was at the hair dressing saloon. There used be a clamour between customers,specially kids like us, to get the film magazine first. Ultimately it used to get divided page by page among us. And on busy Sundays, I used to faithfully surrender my place in the queue to others to be able to spend more time with my share of the page. But then so did the other kids. So a simple haircut used to take all morning. The irony was that none of us actually wanted to have a hair cut—we were all Dilip Kumar fans and preferred to wear our hair long and tousled, much to our parents’ annoyance, and often, their slap.
In the depths of marriage despair, I had to consider Jeremiah 17: 9-10. The heart is deceitful above all things and desperately wicked; who can know it? Now I must wonder, if I would follow a girlfriend that was deceitful and desperately wicked?
Sunday 22nd April, we got up early – there are few things that get us out of our scratcher at a decent time on the weekends, Formula 1 is one of them!
Common Sense lost the will to live as the churches became businesses; and criminals received better treatment than their victims.
When I say that to my parents, when I thank them for never giving up on me, my dad always looks at me like he can't believe I would possibly think that he could ever give up.
Stage 4: Baby survivalOnce you bring that bundle of joy home you realize that it is going to be hard enough to raise the child when you need ot focus the next 18 years just keeping him alive. There are outlets that are perfectly fork-sized, the blades on the ceiling fan turn way too fast and thank God you got rid of that life sized storm trooper, he would have fallen on the baby.
Always smiled at everyone.
I also poured a layer of frozen veggies into the bottom of my casserole dish and added a sprinkle of my favorite garlic and herb seasoning, followed by a few spoonfuls of my favorite jarred pasta sauce.
But, Betsy was different. As I mentioned here, there was a lot of crushes that came and went during my high school years, but the one constant throughout the time was my seething desire to part Betsy's thighs. Despite how badly I wanted her, my mind invariably forgets about her until Groundhog's Day/her birthday rolls around. She's kind of my portal to the "good old days", when things seemed a lot simpler, and I didn't have so many fucking bills to pay. Yep, less debt and long, sexy, gorgeous legs. That's what thinking of Betsy Hagar reminds me of.
The conference will be organized under the initiative of the Media council with the financial support of the institute of open society – the fund of assistance in Tajikistan and the OSCE.
The film also has a truly innovative trailer which speeds through the entire movie in a couple of minutes without really giving anything away and yet being completely in sync with the overall theme and ambition of the project.
I was divorced and in my late 20's at the time, but not at all used to having a friend make such a blunt proclamation. Oddly, it took me a moment to respond. Mike had gotten married just a few months before this lunch. I tried to find the right words that would reject his proposition and yet be polite enough to keep our friendship intact. "Mike, you just got married. It would really be wrong to get involved with someone who was married. It's just not for me. I am flattered though, so thank you."
04 Shine On You Crazy Diamond (Parts I-V)
9:08 as I am pouring the princess her organic, whole milk, the phone rings! it's the mister... "good morning, what's up, you what?" forgot to pay the water bill.. stink!
The place a tea towel on top and let the steam out
June 10 - Draca will be your hostess for this Shimmyshowcase, and she will be welcoming Aianna and Francesca taking their first turns on the Shimmyshowcase dance floor! We still have openings for dancers, so if you would like to join these lovely dancers on the stage at Viento y Agua, please email us at Shimmyshowcase@gmail.com for a performance spot!
I don’t see how anyone could go wrong with an opening like that. I was immediately drawn into the story and the girl, who turned out to be one of the main characters. Her name is Cordelia.
At the beginning of 2012 I thought, "I must post more often on my blog this year."
“because, I don’t know. Sorry that was completely random!”
We have got so far out of the school mentality that we never pay attention to term holidays or grades or anything like that. The other day someone asked my daughter what grade she was in, and neither of us could answer the question. I actually had to count it up on my fingers, because the woman wouldn't accept my daughter's response of, "I'm sort of multi-graded."
As gales roar around them
Why is it that you don’t have an off button? I’d even settle for a dimmer switch..
First and foremost – use the services that are provided by the university! Potential jobs are advertised on Student Central and the placements office on the second floor is a great place to check in if you need any advice.
And all fit nicely, with room to spare, in my Smart car.
Killing Zoe
Now, I say 'small', though I consider that to be a relative term. Hear me out.
My current query letter is below, followed by the first pages of my novel. If you’re REALLY up for a laugh, check out the first query letter I sent just a few months ago, before I found your site.
I'm kind of a weirdo and since my birthday is 3-3-73 and I turned 30 in 2003, I thought that was pretty cool. What wasn't cool was getting sick on my birthday. Not just a cold, I mean stay-in-bed sick. I was so sick; it didn't even bother me that my husband hadn't planned a single thing. I just figured we'd go to a nice dinner once I felt better. So, anyway, my girlfriend called and said she realized I didn't feel well but if I go to her house she'll make sure my family and I get some dinner. I felt bad because she wanted to do something nice for my birthday and since it would just be our two families, I accepted. I put on a comfy pair of sweats and put my hair in a ponytail (probably with a scrunchie *cringe*) and we headed over to her house for some soup. Before we even got there, I knew it was a bad idea. I couldn't smile or act happy to see her when I felt that crappy. I was about to feel a whole heckova lot crappier when all my friends, dressed to the nines, jumped out and yelled "surprise!"
Yesterday I was watering some plants in the back yard when I very large butterfly flew around me and then landed on my shirt front and stayed there while I watered. I said thank you to the butterfly for the nice visit.
By the very act of writing this article I am forever condemned as a racist, by the definition of my critics. However, as their definition is forever being rewritten and redefined so that it can apply to every new threat to their ideology, it is hard to avoid such a label. Indeed why avoid it? If it is racist by their definition to love my country and be proud of my race, then I am a racist. If it is racist to demand accountability from a public figures irrespective of their colour, then I am racist. If it is racist to tell the truth about racial crime and the fact that, despite the government misinformation, the home offices own figures show that white people are disproportionately the victims of race crime, and to a staggering degree, then I am a racist.
Unfortunately it looks like the blooms will be gone before Marblehead’s annual Daisy Days scheduled for Mother’s Day weekend. Naturalists will lead walks through the preserve, so you can still learn a lot about the lovely little flower even if they aren’t blooming.
Creative thought: I've not done much in this area. I know. Help. One year I googled "sentence starters for kids" and used a few of those. Here and there I've used Writing Strands with positive results. That's all I've got.
Set the pan onto a couple large sheets of aluminum foil and smooth them up the sides of the pan to waterproof.
But now look into our eyes
You certainly live and learn.
I have so enjoyed reading Silver Phoenix – it is gripping, magical and lyrical – and a book you very much want to read in a single sitting. Cindy’s distinctive style, reminiscent of Amy Tan, evokes rich imagery which sings colourfully across the pages.
Thanks to all my fellow participants, all those that left comments, and all those that just stopped by to read a random post. It was a fun time and, as I stated previously, I am not opposed to participating again.
It's eerie to think how fast the global village is moving when you consider how young the computer technology is.
Let’s compare Andy Pandy and In the Night Garden. They both have the same running length and are narrated by an unseen narrator. They are both set in a garden in an undisclosed location. They both feature toy-like creatures who come to life.
Please, let me know what you’re thinking about “Fashion King”
Your new found wildness, I refuse to tame,
I don't remember for sure, but I'm guessing Betty Crocker had more of a hand in making the cake than I did. What I do remember for sure is that I didn't level the cake layers. And because the bottom layer was so domed, the top layer broke into four pieces and began sliding down the sides of the cake. At that point I didn't really have time for a backup plan, so I stuck some candles on it and resigned myself to moping. Stephen thought it was hilarious.
My friend Foinah Jameson called customer service and wrote, "They assured me that this item would definitely be removed within the next few hours. The rep I spoke with said that there had been hundreds of tickets logged regarding this matter in the last hour -- he had personally done ten himself. He was horrified by this book. Take a moment to call customer service. It's worth it."
But what about a look for everyday?
As far as I’m concerned, they’re right up there with inverted commas.
B vitamins are generally best taken in balanced complement, unless there is a specific deficiency or need for an individual vitamin. An excess of one component may lead to depletion of the others.
So forgive me for being late with these. Thank you. -Brianna
*My friends are... there for me. I'm sure some of you have known what it's like to feel like you are the outsider in a group. I know I have. A lot. But I don't now. I know my group(s) of friends are there when I need them and I can count on them. This was my wake-up call today. I listened to a voice message today telling me that if I needed anything I could call on her and that I was loved. And I could tell her the same thing. And others. In multiple areas of my life. How awesome is it to know that no matter where I turn, I have friends who will be there for me and tell it to me like it is - difficult or not.
whaps me another 10 times
Publication Date: May 29
These little tags are nice to do because you can complete one rather quickly,
Dennis Hunt, writing in the Los Angeles Times in 1976, said her voice had “a marvelous ‘cracked’ quality” and she “glides through and glances off notes in an appealing offbeat manner.”
A split is formed from the hive when things get a little overcrowded. A portion of the colony splits off, and begins to swarm. Certain other conditions figure in also. Normally, swarming doesn’t begin quite so early in the year. And there are things a beekeeper can do to prevent such things (including observation within the hive, and attempting to do the split themselves), but…
I am also dealing with a lot of other things that really need sorted through. I would really hate to lose a very close friend because of what is going on. I hate feeling betrayed and deceived....so...I am not sure what is going to go on.
Jim Lee (one of the founders of Image Comics, set up in disgust at Marvel’s treatment of creators, now a DC bigwig) said: “As a publisher, we’d be remiss not to expand upon and explore these characters and their stories”.
I started writing novels in 2002, but will fast forward to the particular novel being published, Never Eighteen. I wrote Never Eighteen, then called Mending Fences, during NaNoWriMo (National Novel Writing Month) in 2008. Any book written in 30 days is going to be a real mess. I polished it up a little and entered it in the Amazon Breakthrough Novel Award Contest (ABNA) for that year. I’d entered the year before and made the semi-finals. That year, um, nope. Got ousted after the first round. I sat down and did some major revisions then sent it to different people to read—from readers to writers to people in the business I’d connected with. I took their suggestions to do yet another draft and another. By the time I felt I was finished, I was at Mending Fences, version 15.0 (that’s how I name all my novels to keep the rewrites straight)
dwelt upon the marvels of
The old woman looked misty eyed at the transformation. I'm so embarrassed of how it turned out, she said. Referring to the old sick that had been in the corner by the bathroom door. It had been covered by a bit of newspaper but the old woman couldn't get down that low to clean it up. Actually, it was in her head. She thought, she couldn't get down that low without risk of falling. It was tragic, but this wasn't the reason 'Petra had come. The old woman looked around for something to drink. Being dead had made her a bit thirsty. Again, without a word 'Petra snapped her fingers and a tray consisting of nibbles, two martini glasses and a pitcher of martini appeared.
A stranger was seated next to Little Johnny on the plane when the stranger turned to the Little Johnny and said, "Let's talk. I've heard that flights will go quicker if you strike up a conversation with your fellow passenger."
Hello there! I am so excited to join Nicole in helping you make your fat file on Cloth Diapers! First let me start with a brief introduction…my name is Andrea, and I am a stay-at-home mommy to two precious kids – a girl and a boy. I started using cloth diapers after bringing my newborn daughter home from the hospital in November of 2009. I have been addicted ever since! And until recently, I owned a small online retail store called Doable Diapers - it was the result of my addiction!
Afterward, we chilled on a bench behind the Ferry Building and watched the waves. Toby is obsessed with all water other than baths, and he was so enthralled that he didn't even mind his soaking wet socks.
and flamed
F: Yeah. Yeah. We got a lot of flack. We’re not very popular. You know, we don’t relate to people that we grew up with on this kind of thing, where they are still worshipping the false gurus. You’ve got to do things in life. But it’s really my husband. It’s not me so much. As I say, I followed him on that one. But I do accept it, 100 percent.
- I am used to that. You know I have a weird name and I o-b-v-i-o-u-s-l-y look as a terrorist.
TreeHugger:The demand for shark fins, meat, liver oil, and other products has driven some populations of these animals to the brink of extinction. Up to 73 million sharks are killed annually to support the global trade in their fins." Clearly something has to be done!
The sleekness of youth
This plant keeps coming back every year, one of those plants I don't remember ever planting and just appeared one day by surprise. These little buds are so soft and velvety and form in little clusters at the tips of its long stems. It fits into the scheme of things pretty well, gorgeous bunches of small purple blooms growing right next to my lavender, peonies and hydrangeas its a very pretty patch in my back garden.
Achievements:
You don't realize how much you could possibly love another person until you have children. I mean, maybe your parents expressed love beautifully and you always knew you were loved. Maybe your spouse has never failed to show you how much he loves you. However, you just don't grasp it until you have a child (or children) of your own and you know that you would do ANYTHING for them.
She says please
Well here it is, a patchwork quilt I am making for my Grandson Tom to keep as a reminder of his dear old Gran. lol
Some of the key procurement issues which arise in this arena flow directly from the split character of the governance model.
To fight the battle of the Zeus-lings,
I haven't written this post because I just couldn't bring myself to do it. For the longest time, I blamed myself for failing in some way. Which is ridiculous but it still didn't keep me from feeling like a total loser. If you know me, you know I don't like to do anything half-assed and I don't like to fail. And all this felt like was a total FAIL.
The family room is my favorite room. It is just off the kitchen and dining room feels very open and warm and inviting. The curtains I just made yesterday and they made my favorite room even more favorite!
able to change and take changes
In the ancient days whenever heroes had any doubts on how to proceed on their quests, they would consult the Oracle. But in the present day Oracle was nothing but a dump for useless business data. Google was the one a hero had to turn to for any kind of help in his quest. Google Maps showed the location of Lerna but there was no High Draw anywhere on the map. So he decided to use Google search for High Draw. Most of the results were related to either golf or a card game. A feeling of relief came upon Harvi on discovering that this challenge was going to be just an innocuous game of golf or cards. This was replaced by a feeling of frustration and disappointment at having wasted so much money on the hero gear. He consoled himself that he could always earn money again as long as he stayed alive
Thursday Drink Night happens, more or less, once a week on...um, lemme check. Yep. Thursday. Celebrants sometimes gather in person, but it's more of an online deal in which cocktail bloggers, spirits writers, bartenders, and drinks enthusiasts fire up their computers, chat with each other, and mix cocktails based on a theme or a particular spirit. This week, the theme is tiki...with a twist.
I’ll end – like any good speechwriter – with a joke courtesy of our driver (who we found by chance), Raul (so you can blame him if his ha-ha is off the mark).
The funniest thing Renae has been doing lately in regards to Spanish is when I ask her a question in Spanish, she'll usually respond in English . . . correctly! So I'm learning that she understands much of what is said to her in Spanish, but lacks the vocabulary to say what she'd like to say. This also means that I need to start speaking to her more in Spanish . . . . I'll try and be inspired by my friend Bea from Spain who speaks to her son Jaime almost entirely in English while her husband speaks to him in Spanish. That's the way to do it folks!
Is that a clock on the counter? Yes, yes it is! I got it at an interior design warehouse sale for $10.
Foreign Correspondent
And, as I looked around,
Franklin's suggestion was largely overlooked until it was brought up again in 1907 by Englishman William Willett, who penned a pamphlet called "The Waste of Daylight." Although the British House of Commons rejected Willett's proposal to advance the clock one hour in the spring and back again in autumn in 1908, British Summer Time was introduced by the Parliament in 1916.
“I came to the conclusion long ago that all life is six to five against.”
We are marked as wounded, fragile,
There was good citizenship when citizens accept the responsibility and accountability of participating in governance, in the management of the country.
Whatever type of photographer you want to hire, it’s important that:
Dim street lights
The bride is the daughter of the couple who bought my husband’s company from us, she is also the one who took over my job. Beyond that, we really have no attachment to her, the Bride, and we don’t even know the Groom!
It took me over four hours to drive to Providence last night! I had forgotten to factor in the holiday weekend traffic. So by the time I finally got here to the Hotel Providence, I was fried. I seem to have picked up a cold too, driving thru Massachusetts... I decide to hide out in my luxurious hotel room, order steak frites, and watch "Bridesmaids". Oh, and I had creme brûlée for dessert too! So there. Totally decadent.
Liberal feminists, the puppets of multiculturalism — What do you attribute the foul silence of feminists and liberals to when news about attacks to the dignity of women in Catalonia arise?
Of that era, what about "Valmead", there's a lot of people that might call that one of your band's best songs?
1/2-tsp. ground black pepper
So, in an effort to try to avoid all of those nasties, I've been trying for years to reproduce the dishes we like best at home. But it's hard to compete with those ingredients. And I'm not Chinese, so I have no family recipes handed down to me to help me understand how this cuisine is created (and I doubt they'd taste the same as the American Chinese food, anyway). Yes, I can follow a cookbook recipe, but they just don't compare to the Chinese restaurant versions of the same dishes. What's an Irish-German-Swedish-French-American gal supposed to do?
If we look at the incident files in question, the second (incident=2356996) is a continuation of the first (incident=2356995).
First I would like to express my gratitude to my fellow team mates - Linda Robinson, Cheryl Nelson and Ros Crawford. These girls are THE BEST!!! They have been wonderful team mate for 2 long years, not only they helped to come up with our weekly theme, go around and leave comments for our entries each week, they cast their votes to pick the winners and make lovely project for the blog, they even contributed lots of lovely prize packages for our winners! THANK YOU ladies, for making CCCB a fun place to be for all.
Therefore, I am considering getting a mohawk.
*He is starting to try to throw Annabelle's toys for her! They only go about 2 feet and she kind of just looks at him like, "That's all you've got?" But, it's pretty cute to watch them play together!
Feisty People are well-admired: Shut up!
701 Pike St, Ste. 800
- Party Time! You have destroyed my house! And when the man comes round from housing to fix the light you broke he is going to see the state of the place and have me turfed outta here!!
FAVORITE QUOTE: " I'll give you some good advice, be selfish, be greedy and trust no one."
Some problems, obviously, are greater than others, and facing them isn’t so simple. But if we want to break out of a cycle that’s keeping us from fully blossoming, we’ve got to do what we’ve got to do to break free of it.
measures approx. 16" tall ~
Macpherson adopts the same partisan and defensive posture when he tries to justify the behaviour of Duwayne Brooks, who was, we are told, ‘stereotyped as a young black man exhibiting unpleasant hostility and agitation’ (para, 5.12). Macpherson’s willingness to accept without question that the whites who assaulted Stephen Lawrence used the word “nigger” is contrasted with his readiness to doubt the possibility that Brooks used grossly offensive language when the police arrived at the scene of the murder (“pigs” being one of the milder words, see para, 5.13). Macpherson concedes, grudgingly, that Brooks said these things and admits that such offensive language may explain why he was ignored by the police at the hospital (para, 5.13). Nevertheless, ever willing to find fault with the police, Macpherson asserts, too, that: ‘We do not believe that a young white man in a similar position would have been dealt with in the same way’ (para, 5.31). Why are we to believe that a young white man who called the police “cunts” and “pigs” at the scene of a murder and who behaved in an aggressive manner would not have been treated in this way? To take this further, are we to believe that had Brooks been white he would not have been arrested for (allegedly) causing damage to a car? (para, 5.27).
As you may or may not know, I'm an event planner, and we just entered busy season. This means I'm currently planning for events in New Orleans, Chicago, Minneapolis, San Diego, and Paris. In addition, I'm bookending my London/Paris work trip with trips to Scotland, Switzerland and Italy, so I'm trying to get that squared away as well. I also have another more personal event I'm planning for on the horizon, but more on that later...
Fly me to the moon - 5.3M
It panned out because he landed some financial partners who also love the area, including Matt Kruger of Chicago and Connecticut's Clifford Mallory and Konrad Wos.
The next problem was that JT65-HF refused to "talk" to Ham Radio Deluxe, despite both programs being configured correctly. This meant that the frequency had to be entered mannually, so that any reported spots sent to the RBN and PSKReporter were labelled correctly.
That is a quote by Alice Miller in a preface from her 2002 edition of "For Your Own Good"
The word of the LORD came to me, saying,
Certainly, 2 Peter 3:4 is being fulfilled. Sadly, many have been willingly ignorant of the details involving the day(s) of judgment and so the scoffing and mocking is exploding as they question “where is the promise of His coming?”
At some point after this gig - the Internets are woefully unclear on the timing - Sooyoung completely rebuilt the band, replacing his entire surrounding cast.
Firstly I must apologise for this late post. Tomorrow is a public holiday here, but this long weekend still doesn't seem to be long enough for me to get everything done! Luckily this challenge is as simple as it gets.
2. Traditional Fantasy
Place 1 cored, peeled apple on each square. Sprinkle each with 2 teaspoons sugar and a sprinkling of cinnamon and nutmeg to taste;
Living under surveillance and under fear.
And here's a little info about them...
So you talk about the weather and you say
15. Slip stitch to center of chain 10 space, chain 1, single crochet in space, *chain 10, single crochet in next space* around, join to 1st single crochet.
“The biggest driver of individual life insurance growth was whole life,” says Ashley Durham, LIMRA’s senior research analyst. “It’s the only product to produce positive growth in each of the past five years.”
Anyhow, I just have to add a few comments here about healthy stuff in general.
This week I made a 6"x6" Criss Cross Card. This is a real easy card to make. Humphrey is colored using Spectrum Noir markers. I stamped my image a couple of times, and fussy cut certain pieces of the image so I could layer them on top of my main image to give it a 3-d look.
Shocking. That is probably the best word I can use to describe this book. It is raw, it is spiritual, and it is real. The first time I read through this I was able to identify with Cecilia the most.
I surrender …
Your parents really are smart. Give them a chance.
I don't think I actually knew this information at first, as I re-pinned the photo from someone else - the fun and the curse of Pinterest, at least if you are needing original sources!
Delicious Doodles also has it's own Challenges on blogger and a shop blog page featuring inspiration from the Design Team.
As far as winner Galen Rupp goes, I was more than impressed. Galen gets a lot of flack for such things as his training with Alberto Salazar, rather than Vin Lananna, amongst other reasons. What I saw was a true XC Champion. He stayed cool when Chelanga tried to run away with the race early. He stayed poised throughout and then pulled even. He saved his energy and brought home his 1st NCAA XC Championship. He seemed happier actually with Oregon's team win. He was having a blast with his teammates down towards the awards area and they all seemed very happy to be with each other. Watching the Oregon team celebrate was like watching a former HS All-American parade (Galen Rupp, Luke Puskedra, Shadrac Kiptoo-Biwott, Matt Centrowitz JR, Diego Mercado, Kenny Klotz) and Galen's fellow 2008 Olympian Andrew Wheating.Pretty fast bunch of kids. Oregon defeated Iona and Stanford for the team title.
Lord Freud explained: “I am hopeful that PIP will do a better job than DLA….I shall now turn to the more technical aspects of this issue – that is, looking at what we are doing with the PIP and its assessment. Is it a medical assessment…? It absolutely is not.
We fight in a spiritual war that can only be waged with spiritual weapons. Satan and his demons would like nothing better than to disrupt our relationships and break up our families. Every home is a target. We cannot remain passive.
(Ur-Biere de Neuve: Warm Conditioned, Barrel Aged Sour)
Waitress: Um, okay, guys? Why don't you wait until I count to three this time, so we can....
Recent research shows that – During the first 6 months of life, babies have the ability to babble using sounds that make up all the languages in the world. They then learn to talk using only the sounds and words they pick up from their surroundings, most importantly from their caregivers. A baby’s brain will then slowly discard the ability to speak in languages he or she does not hear. Children need to be exposed to a different language for at least 30 percent of their waking hours to become multilingual.
karenbelgrad@thetwocentscorp.com
open drawer that contains supplies
Number of Pages: 304 pages
9.get with it
“Your right, with the election coming up I’m too busy any way,” Judy couldn’t help but think that she would never find love.
i, naked, so bare: for barefoot souls
Sunday A (age 11) made a paper frisbee, as part of a verse go-along activity, in her Sunday school class. It's a very good frisbee, and still processing the whole higher math debate, I thought it could probably be used for a nice geometry lesson, too.
sculptures, drawings—the most intimate aspects of people’s daily
The new secondary plan is focused on “design excellence,” and it tries to strike a balance between growth and maintaining the city’s historic core, de Groot said.
Do you really think Malaysians, ranking numero uno in Facebook usage would truly believe that the Cuti-cuti Malaysia Facebook page is worth RM 1.8 million?
Country of origin: printed in New Zealand
‘It will help hard-pressed opposition groups and brave civil society organisations inside and outside the country to document the regime’s violations and gain the skills and resources they need to help build a democratic future for Syria.’
Finally, at about 11 feet tall, it started to bloom. Nothing like the yuccas with their white petals. Everything is about fine details with this plant, from it's purple speckles on the leaves to the filaments that come out on the bloom spike.
leave me. I am growing
However, many of these awards-worthy contenders will be little more than re-hashed, pre-packaged dross from which we would advise the avid cinema-goer to steer well clear. So, blinker yourself to the yards of column inches, starlit names and swollen marketing budgets and instead sign up to our New You 2012 Best Results Ever Screen Diet Plan with this quick round-up of the most exciting films out this January. Don’t you feel goooood.
Today Paul overcame one of his biggest fears. He had his hair cut by a professional hairdresser.
So weighted down by all of the accumulations that you carry; they started before you were even birthed
There, no moral or anything. No conclusion - no neat little blogger's conclusion - didn't even end with a rhetorical question, throwing the whole thing open to the floor like Scamp does, no wonder I can't get the stats. What kind of post is that then - a fucking failed thalidomide limb of a post - see, it's not even ending, looks like it's just sort of trailing off...
BLITZER: Speaker Gingrich, you had an ad, but you pulled it this week, in which you described Governor Romney as the most anti- immigrant candidate. Why did you do that?
Whatever the new header design ends up like,
Tea time "I love to sneak away for tea at an elegant hotel. I get to valet park, sit down in a room with adults, and have someone wait on me for a change."— Mary Benson, mother of Brendan, 8 months, Fla.
10% cream cheese
Tuesday we put on our walking shoes and walked along the Behana Gorge track which is only 10 mins south of Gordonvale. The walk is 3.2km and took us an hour in and an hour. The water was even colder here and much higher and faster than we have ever seen it.
4. “Son, no yelling.”
Festivals require some preparation. Yes, it’s all about experiencing the music with friends and drinks and yes, festivals have been associated with a certain freedom and do-what-the-fuck-you-want spirit that grew out of a free love and drug culture; however, you still need to think about two basic things – that is, unless you are going to re-create Woodstock or something, then disregard everything I’m saying. First, the clothing. When you go to spring or fall festivals, you should dress in layers. This way you can take things off (light jackets or scarves) when you get warm and put them on when you are cold. Usually flat boots or some sort of cushioned flat (chucks, sperrys, Toms, etc) are the best, followed by comfy flip flops if it’s warm enough. Generally, four-inch heels are considered to be a really dumb idea. Along with that, skanky little skirts, thigh highs and see through tops are pretty dumb as well. You aren’t comfortable in that and let’s face it, it’s NOT warm enough to be dressed in skimpy clothes. Additionally, you look horrible…seriously.
Jennifer Hudsons boobs are squashed by the halter top. Not flattering.
I purchased, over the net, an excellent do it yourself homemade solar cells guide. The guide very clear shows you in both written and video format exactly how to make your first solar panel with materials costing less than two hundred dollars.
Besides vaginal sex, she reportedly also offered other services such as “BBBJ, AJ, AR, CIM” which explained her higher rates than other girls in Tang’s stable.
Silenced is coming along well. (For those of you who are new and don't know what Silenced is... it's my WIP.) The editing is taking a turn I didn't expect. As I'm reading through, I'm finding places where new idea's come about and I just have to add them in. It seems it went from an editing phase back to a rewrite.
What do the BBC, our politicians, our leaders say about this – NOTHING.
I am working hard on thinking up fun things to introduce over the next few weeks, that will link to the Jubilee, but in a way that toddlers will understand and enjoy. I would love to hear of any ideas you have had or blog posts you have written on the subject. Please feel free to post a link in the comment box below and we can all share our Jubilee ideas!
Thank you to Marvin for sharing his wisdom and giving me permission to include his message in this blog post. Marvin is a writer, artist, and retired art teacher. You can learn more about Marvin at www.bartelart.com or www.goshen.edu/art/ed/art-ed-links.html (Art and Learning to Think and Feel).
Tuesday afternoon I set out in a different direction. I headed East on 136th, up the hill towards The City College, past Philip Randolph High School, through Saint Nicholas Park (to grandmother’s house I go…), to catch the express train down to midtown. I have to say, I’m getting pretty good at navigating my little slice of the island. I dropped a few postcards in the mail at 125th, and pressed on. After I made a few returns, I again found myself in the East Village. I stopped at a lovely little wine bar called the Barrel (the inside of the place was shaped…like the inside of a barrel. Cute.). Here’s my recommendation for the day: if you ever find yourself in a new place, overwhelmed by the menu, trust your server! Honestly, one of my favorite things about the job that I do is getting people to try things they’ve never had before. And even if your server isn’t as fantastic at his or her job as I am, they still probably have tried most things on the menu, so they would know better than you (the person who hasn’t ever had anything on the menu) what’s good.
As an author, I am immensely grateful for that.
275 **4. “Law & Politics,” Political Science Reviewer, vol. 25, pp. 3-4, 127-50 (1996). (Incorporated in Item C-2001(5), above, pp. 225-39.)
I go up to Grandma's room and get her ship I.D. You see, back in 2005, Princess Cruise lines did not include a picture I.D. on their ship cards, or a date of birth. They simply branded the card "A" for adult in the bottom right hand side of the card and you were set to drown yourself in booze if you wanted to. With that, I became Alice.
Ideas come easily to me, but the writing part is hard work. For me, though, there are stories that simply have to be told, and I’m driven to sit and write them.
Today at Mr. Matt's "I Owe Dan A Beer" Capone beer emporium, is his Saison event. Looks like he is slacking a bit with only 15 of them today. What about those other 15 taps? I guess am I going to have get to the bottom of this glass, I mean this. Sunny days and Saisons. Is there anything better? So here be the total tap list for the day.
Card # 379: Magglio Ordonez, 2010 Topps Gold 212, Detroit Tigers (379/2010)
Don't you know that you can count me out
Fairy tales were part of our diet, too. I especially loved our edition of Hans Christian Andersen’s The Swineherd and The Tinder Box, illustrated by Gustav Hjortlund and translated by R.P. Keigwin. We also read poetry, and I took great pride in being able to recite many of the poems in A.A. Milne’s Now We Are Six.
d. The wonderful, fantastic Frenchie Kiss and the ridiculously hot Jett Adore are competing at The Burlesque Hall of Fame with their show-stopping duet. For which I designed Ms. Kiss’s costume. And I’m getting to work on a gown for her to wear when they win. Fantastic.
if not she will snip
06 Sleeping In A Jar 2:45
It's recognisable it's true
Frugal... Lives with parents.
Written by Martha Whitmore Hickman. Illustrations by Giuliano Ferri. Ages 4-8.
Over the weekend however, my mother-in-law sent me this, which I know you'll all find equally helpful:
Something else that I have been trying to tackle lately - naptime! Landon is a little, uhm, spoiled. Yes, in 2 short weeks he will be 3 years old, but we STILL rock him to sleep for both nap and bedtime. So, how am I to do that while also nursing and caring for a 2 week old? Not to mention that I am not supposed to carry anything over 10 pounds for up to 8 weeks due to my c-section? It's not easy, but we're getting there. We have been crawling up into the master bed, watch a little bit of Nick Jr., and then when the TV takes a nap (that goodness for timers!) then we do to. Corinne lays next to me and nurses herself to sleep...so hopefully this will continue to work!
Sometimes: I really can't believe that the guys are just as catty as the girls on The Bachelorette.
“And humans do not?” The Queen’s gaze slid across Clary and Simon. “This vampire, this Daylighter you bring everywhere with you — he is the one whose kiss you did not desire, here in my Court, is he not? Do you care for him at all, or is only the Mark of God on him that causes you to bring him with you, like a shield? And you,” she added, turning to Simon, “you who loved her, now you lend your not inconsiderable power to the project of finding the one she loves more? Where is the advantage to you?”
It may be that the media's failure to report the truth about violence against women lulls some white women into a sense of security, by providing them with a false safety barrier, and the belief that they can indulge a fantasy whilst risking only a slap, although some pay a higher price.
Fri 10/31 New Orleans, LA House of Blues
The ill Effects of those that bite back
So today in celebration of ourselves I would really love for everyone to find something that they truly love about their bodies.
THE BEACH FIGHT HAD BEGAN!
Think about how terrible it would be if the disciples failed in this new trial of faith. According to the Biblical record it would be a week before the promise of the Father would be forthcoming. Would they remain inJerusalemor would they do like they did in John 21:2,3. Peter, Thomas, Nathaniel, James and John were together and Peter, in his impatience, said, “I go a fishing.” That is all that was needed, the suggestion, and they replied, “We go also with thee.” What better thing would there be to do? The Lord was not there. They had no idea when or where He would appear. Three of those five men were fishermen by profession. We see again humanistic behaviour.
My mother leaned forward and said quietly, "It's alright. She's homeschooled."
AFP
There are many people who force their kids to Do Everything Right who end up with angry and rebellious kids, kids who drop out of high school, unhappy-but-successful kids, or some combination of these. There are no guarantees. All you can do is choose how you will respond to the reality of life today. All you can do is choose the kind of parent you want to be today, the kind of life you want your kids to have today, and the kind of relationship you want with them today.
As great as the art and the adventure was, this one was not without some flaws. I felt like some of the pages were over burdened with too much text, which did two negative things: covered up the art, and slowed down the flow of the story. Another thing that bothered me a bit was that the ending felt really abrupt. This could have easily been twice as long as the 64 pages it chimes in at. When I had turned the last page I felt a little bit cheated. My first thought was that there's got to be a sequel, but from what I can uncover from research, it looks like this is all I'll be getting. It is kinda fun to imagine for myself what happens to the characters after the last page is turned, but I would have been happier with more material.
Richard and Linda Thompson - I Want To See The Bright Lights Tonight - 1974
‘Where does he poo?’
Taylor’s grin morphed to a scowl as he killed the engine. “Man, that’s a low blow, even for her. She knows what happened.”
Unfortunately just as I've shaken off the respiratory department I've fallen into the clutches of gastro-enterology and I don't think ENT are in much of a hurry to release me either. I'm very relieved Dr Heartsink thought it was a bad idea to stick tubes up and down a bendy person, but I do have to go through a barium meal and ultra-sound. I'm negative about this as I have previously been through the barium meal, ultra sound, head shaking, referral to dietician merry go round and have learnt as much as is possible from the experience about how to manage symptoms and maintain my weight. If it wasn't for the insistence of the DWP on reassessing everyone endlessly I might have had the confidence to have that conversation with my doctors and some of these tests might not have been needed.
Me: Sorry. What?
I booked my last 3 vacation days on the 14,15 and 16th of the month, so next weekend I should tackle the attic floor devisions, Gallery panneling, and then either assemble the Library bookcases or carve the Caryatides for the music room.
This incredible spread is a perfect match for any breakfast food including ( gluten free of course) muffins, pancakes, toast, etc. It is sweet but contains no sugar or sweetners and it's made with nut butter which provides protein. Kids will love it, and it will send them off with a healthy meal!
Mastered by MOB.
and no one there.
and practically wreck everything
When people who have experienced salvation in such a deep way and then have fallen away by not trusting in Yahushua’s death (Christ Jesus) and in His high priestly office and go back to animal sacrifice and the system of the cohanim (priest’s) which the Torah set up to administer them, then it is impossible to renew them so that they turn from their sin, as long as for themselves they keep on executing the Son of God on the stake all over again.
Bless 'im. He does just that, runs, and before my eyes the prettiest sunset unfolds and I do my best to make some pictures. Click, click.
½ teaspoon onion salt
okay here you go anyway :)
Gardening is something that is best done with a clear head, or at least when the head is clear enough for cohesive thought. After all, running the tiller while not thinking isn’t a good idea especially if you want to keep what you’ve already planted. Further, I really do what to keep all my toes. So, I don’t think I’ll be running the tiller today.
The announcement that the group would feature more than 7 members caused a firestorm of comparisons to industry established groups such as Girls’ Generation, as well as T-ara and After School, groups which recently saw the expansion of members to 9. In addition to theses comparisons, much debate is held over the stylistic and artistic direction of the group in relation to the much celebrated YG girl group, 2NE1.
Chris looked with silence and sorrow. In the glare of the spotlights, they could see that the driver’s door was streaked with something and a deathly-colored puddle lay between the car and the curb. It was enough to fill a kitchen sink and had begun to coagulate. Barely visible and sticking out of the puddle was the slight impression of a handgun, shiny with a gelatinous plasma covering. Next to the puddle was a man’s body with a towel from the shoulders on up. The sergeant nodded to a patrolman to lift the towel. There were shreds of skin where the neck would have been and a stump of a spine sticking up between the shoulders. The patrolman quickly put the towel down again.
Laundry.
HOW DEEP SHOULD YOU DIG?
And shame
Yes, this time of year was arbitrarily chosen centuries ago to recast pagan lunar festivals in a new light. Yes, many of the traditions of Christmas (fir trees, gift-giving, wreaths, etc.) find their source in pagan socio-religious rites. Yes, Jesus was probably more likely born in April, not December. Yes, Christmas has been co-opted by commercialism and consumerism. Nevertheless, this time has been set aside for nearly two millennia so that Christians around the world could, with one mind and heart, dwell upon the depths of the glory given to us in the events that transpired all those years ago.
There were quite a few lacunae in this tale. Not only does the opening chapter pick up on the other side of those colossal gates of Nessus, in the town of Saltus (some commentators have noted that since the action apparently is set in South America, that Nessus may be the corruption of Buenos Aires and Saltus may be the alteration of the Argentine province/town of Salta), but the tone of the narrative changes. The careful reader has already noted, doubtless, that while Severian's eidetic memory has left him sharing all sorts of petty little details such as the stories from the brown book from Ultan's library in Nessus that he took after Thecla's suicide and his banishment to Thrax, there is so much that he is skipping or deigning to downplay. The open lies and lies by omission that will later become a hallmark of Severian's character are more on display here.
That’s right, I said it. A sandwich.
I don't.
Majjige Palidha - Yogurt gravy with lentil dumpling
This party is a bit hard to classify. On one hand it’s some kind of “working man’s party” — taking over thousands of voters from the old, almost fossil Social Democratic Party — and on the other hand it’s a “populist”, nationalistic party — often (untruthfully) accused of outright racism. In fact, it’s the party that every other politicians and all gutmenschen love to hate. Maybe that’s one of the reasons for its success with ordinary Danes…?
It's time to rethink Sarah Palin. From the moment that Republican presidential candidate John McCain plopped her on his ticket, the supreme article of political faith from all pundits, much of the press, most Democrats, and the GOP establishment has been that Sarah Palin is a laughingstock, a sideshow diversion, an ignoramus on the issues, a gossip and celebrity starved media creation, and, of course, a closet race tinged crowd baiter. The Palin allure is built squarely on elements of these features. But what's now painfully obvious, is the allure has turned Palin into a political force, threat, and danger.
This dress is PERFECT! Perfect! I'll take one in every single color please! The cut, the heart print mesh at the top, the sweetheart bust... I want a million of them. Can you just picture how precious it'd be in red and pink and yellow and green and purple, etc? Yeah, overkill, whatever. Another one of those dresses that I'd wear every day!
Mynas are frequently sighted here like there’s always one when u need and Koels flew in once food left at the compound. They even beat the crows by arriving early to finish the left over and if this continues one day instead of shouting out for crows on special days to treat with vada, we perhaps could send sweet calls to Koel.
Switching gears from Christmas yesterday, I have a Halloween layout to share today. I still have so many Halloween things, like the pumpkin patch, carving pumpkins, etc. to scrapbook, but I’ve decided to let them just come instead of forcing them since the results will be better I’m sure.
TOMIS ID: 00435699
And I never dreamed that I'd gain a pound or two.
Well, it’s my blog and I’ll cry if I want to. Even if it does make me look like a silly raccoon.
1 grieves
But I have seen people use waiting constructively. I’ve seen them plan for contingencies, so that whatever happens they are better prepared: ”If this happens, I can…, but if this happens I will…” I’ve seen people prepare others for what might happen. That might be as simple as explaining why I may be late getting home tonight; it might be as critical as making a will or, as my mother did, talking to her children about their lives after she died.
supplied the illustration and asked for a VERY short story
Not since I heard stories as a child of Nazis using human skin as home decor items, have I been so disgusted with ones choice of personal decor/adornment.
It usually comes with this line: “Subject: Letter from Procter & Gamble Exec to Obama.” It may be entitled “An Open Letter to President Obama.” It’s a letter filled with rant and inaccurate claims against Obama. But it demonstrates something troubling. It’s a letter from a guy who should know better, from a guy who can read newspapers and check facts for himself, but a guy who has been suckered in by every false and calumnous claim made against our President.
01 Skull - Flump (3:23)
Asher's vocabulary at 14 months is very impressive (but I'm his mom so everything he does is impressive to me...). I guess all of the days where all we do is read and read some more are showing their fruit!
"Back Where You Belong" by 38 Special
It strikes me then that learning is relatively simple by comparison to the difficult business of unlearning and breaking the habits and conditioning of a lifetime!
“We’ve always encouraged young people: Take a shot, go for it, take a risk, get the education, borrow money if you have to from your parents, start a business.”
As I mention in the blogs What is Grooming? And Grooming: Confusion and Manipulation, grooming is when someone presents themselves as one way, to have an appropriate relationship with you, and then after gaining trust changes that relationship to sexual violence.
4. There! I've Said It Again
Blewett 2
It is so hard to pick my favorite project, but my favorite collection is NOSTALGIA collection; more specifically the collection pack! Not only do you get 12 sheets of paper, you also get a sheet of stickers AND chipboard!
Sunday-20 minute walk pushing Adeline
This entire operation of The Daleks seems a bit overly-complicated. The concept is that by putting Jamie through a series of trials, they can isolate qualities that make humans unique and able to conquer The Daleks. This is all well and good on paper, but actually sitting through it gets a bit old. Maybe it would be better if the episode still existed, but I can’t help but wonder if what I imagine is probably better than how it was realized. Perhaps my boredom with the trials shows my own lack of imagination. But I also think I’m marred by being part of the generation that grew up with video games, and all I can see is an 8-bit Scotsman making his way through a series of levels, avoiding traps and pits and Daleks. One level ends with Jamie having to fight a Turkish Wrestler, but if you defeat him, you get the ability to summon him in battle. If I had any skill with Photoshop, I’d try to recreate this image. Evil of The Daleks the game.
I never for once contemplated that Julian and I would be so tired in our mid 30’s. Many couples within this age range are either professionally successful or buying into their second home. . .not broke, bankrupt, and unemployed the way we both were.
20. L.I.A.B.
6. Stop judging others: “The monk, says Moses, must never judge his neighbor at all in any way whatever.” “They said of Abba Macarius that just as God protects the world, so Abba Macarius would cover the faults he saw, as though he did not see them, and those he heard, as though he did not hear them.”
image might spring to mind of a plump matron baking cookies in an apron with a graying bun tied up at the nape of her neck. Not so of Renata Lenart, the indomitable mother of heroine Katrina Lenart, in the historical romantic thriller GOODBYE NOEL by Nike Chillemi. Renata is an accomplished pianist and a fashion maven, quite able with needle and thread. She can transform the most ordinary of dresses into something spectacular. Since her husband owns and operates the finest millinery shop in the county, both she and her daughter continually sport hats which are the latest in fashion...or the cat's meow, as some in that era would say. Renata is quite able to march into the local courthouse, hat perched on her head, to fight for the welfare of an orphaned infant. GOODBYE NOEL won in the Grace Awards 2011 Mystery/Romantic
All-Butter Double-Crust Pie Dough for one 9-inch pie for hand mixing
Don’t clip for junk. It’s undeniable: most coupons are for processed, insanely over-packaged crap, and hoarding them will only lead to blown cash and rampant unhealthiness. (*cough* Hot Pockets *cough*) However, you should always …
Straight-laced and fairly conservative Lauren Conrad is the last person we thought would be rocking the oh so trendy dip dyed look but hey stranger things have happened. Lauren showed up to her book signing at Barnes & Noble sporting a hot pink color on the bottom part of her hair that we absolutely adore along with her signature cat-eye liner.
Found myself on this mad mission
But these are all extraordinary things, and few eyewitnesses bother to record sounds so common as to be almost unnoticeable. I wrote a diary for ten years, and never once mentioned the constant ‘beep-beep-beep’ of the crossing outside my front-door – just the kind of thing a historical novelist 200 years from now will want to know. Only a poet tends to reference the mundane, as John Donne writes of ‘the noise of a fly… the rattling of a coach… the whining of a door’, but even then they rarely describe.
This is the first major hurtle facing publishers and developers alike next generation. A problem that will be extremely hard to remedy. It is a problem being faced not only on physical disk, but downloadable titles and even mobile games.
Do you have that person in your life? Are you that person for someone? Is that person a best friend, former boyfriend, family member or someone else important to you?
“We, the Proudly New South African Government and People consider AIDS, to be the Most Wonderful Black Depopulation Biological Warfare Invention Ever.”
Remember Mr. Pimp for these posts here and here? His little potty mouth has gotten the best of him again! We were at recess on Friday when this little girl in his class came running up to us and said that Mr. Pimp "just called Crystal a BITCH". I use all caps so you understand that the girl said it with such deliberation! This was unfortunate because the church bells had just rang which means it's time to line up, so their were about 40 six year olds standing there to here this tattle.
Jude's ventilator settings are minimal and we are hopeful that he will be able to continue to use those beautiful lungs that are now open and no longer covered by other organs!
Avert your eyes if you happen to see that.
Last night at the Source Below was the best show I’ve ever done.
Thank you for all you hard work and best wishes with your many creative ventures Lori x
The Tefal has a retractable power cord, the iron handle has a trigger which allows you to release steam as you're ironing and it glides effortlessly over clothes. It's as close as you will get to ironing nirvana, if such a place exists. Here is a link to a short (about two minutes) video on how to use it. (It shows you how to vertical steam suits and jackets too.)
The real message he is carrying is that both parties–the “duopoly,” as he calls it–are paralyzed by polarization and inertia, and that the Republican Party in particular is pursuing an “unsustainable” course.
First, I am not criticising the judges. I have no quarrel with them whatsoever. Some are even friends of mine.
"Maybe that's why they were trying to heal him," Joe Bill said. "Maybe they wanted him to talk so he could confess his sins and go to Heaven when he died." I found this book to be pretty good although it was mostly dialog without much action. It's a quick read.
Yet I suspected that was not the usual case. So I analyzed traffic to this site, and found that less than 1% of you reading this came because you were searching for a recording I have posted. Chances are, you are coming here to glean a near-CD quality recording of an album, and perhaps an artist, new to you. Therefore as I continue digitizing my vinyl collection, unless I have seen a high bit rate copy posted on another blog recently, I'll post my records for you, with due respect to other bloggers that have similar tastes and longer history.
Kira thought again of the way he had looked at her at the river the night before and sighed. She imagined what it would be like to feel his arms slide around her waist and draw her to him. The wind blew and she let it be his breath on her neck and his hands in her hair. A beat began in her head, making her feel sultry, and she moved in time with it, locked in Phantom Keith’s embrace. She pictured him spinning her around through turns, only to press her body firmly against his once more.
In the few minutes that it took us to drive there, neither of us spoke a word. Just as we arrived one of Phillip’s brothers came running down the street, his arms held wide, screaming his name. There was a crowd and then there was the ambulance.
Bill McKibben, TomDispatch
Iranians watched the award presentation ceremony live on Manoto 1, a London-based international Persian-language television network.
You hurt my feelings.
In mid-August the focus turned to the French banks. A rumour circulated that Société Générale was in trouble, and there was a massive fall in its share price (with a 50-60% fall between June and September). Société Générale shares were worth €52.7 in February, while by early September they had fallen to €21.19. Société Générale holds €2 billion of Greek bonds, while BNP Paribas holds €4 billion and Crédit Agricole holds €800 million. Big investors and speculators fear that a Greek government default on its debts would precipitate a deep crisis for these three major French banks, which play a key role in the French economy. French government ministers assert that the fears about these banks are ‘irrational’. Any short-term liquidity problem (ie a shortage of funds to cover current business) would be covered by intervention by the ECB. They deny that there is a basic solvency problem, asserting that these banks have enough capital reserves to survive a Greek default and other shocks. French ministers have furiously rejected the idea that they are discussing plans to nationalise these banks. This is reminiscent of the position of Gordon Brown and Alistair Darling at the time of the Northern Rock bank crisis in 2007/08.
The theme for this year's SXSW has finally reared it's ugly head to me. The 2009 SXSW quest is to find the best fuzz-based, psychedelic, garage rock band at the festival.
At University of Wisconsin Madison librarians developed an institutional bibliography within Bibapp which compliments their institutional repository. The software has five majors connected parts: works, groups, people, publications, and publishers. This tool seems similar to VIVO, which was developed at Cornell, and allows development of individual researcher profiles. Also allows listed of faculty by department, which links to higher level, College of Engineering for instance. Could be useful for departments when creating annual reports. They started with engineering physics which has 27 faculty members. They mapped workflow and relied on student employees and library liaisons, they tapped into technical services staff for quality control. The students searched Google Scholar and engineering databases to find items on each CV. Google scholar didn’t offer great citations, but the links into the native publishers obviously offered. Goal: to find 80% but only found around 70%. They used citation managers.
10′ AMRAP
PHEBUS wines are crafted at Fabre Montmayou Bodega using state of the art wine-making techniques. Diane and Herve Joyaux have owned this estate since 1999.
Aside from even those things, which are valid, generally, for myself, writing allows me to explore myself, to dig up old thoughts & feelings that I’ve buried for about ten to twenty years, and am finally willing & able to mentally & emotionally unearth those things. It’s actually very scary, because there are some things, within all Human beings, that we would rather leave dead & buried. But, then, if you don’t let those things go, through letting them out through some type of channel, they can and will consume you eventually.
pictures of an exhibition
At its most basic level, The Woman asks a straightforward question: Who’s the real monster, a cannibalistic mountain woman (Pollyanna McIntosh) or Chris Cleek (Sean Bridgers), the sleazy small-town lawyer who captures and imprisons her? Even though the answer is choreographed early on, it’s how director Lucky McKee explores the idea as the picture moves forward that sells the concept.
…can turn a cardboard box into a lawnmower
Escorted by frail excuses, each one of the girls clattered their belongings and vanished. I stood to confront him, but only breathed him in. “Why are you here?”
I'll write more notes on Mattie's voice, her negotiating skills, the novel's use of the "innocent eye," and the differences between the novel and the Coen brothers' movie presently.
so that I may eventually be a better, more beautiful person on the inside.
That none of these are the one last thing that she wanted to say today. It is something even I cannot tell you. It is something only she can say. To only you. It will have to wait until “later.”
To play the game:
I used coconut palm sugar in this recipe, a relatively new ingredient to me, but one I’ve grown pretty fond of. It’s the dried sap from the coconut palm flower and is the “no brainer” of sugar replacements, as you can swap it 1:1 for the white processed stuff. I’ll talk more about coconut palm sugar in another post, but if you can’t get a hold of any try using any dry sweetener that you like.
Forest City Ratner, part of a publicly-traded company based in Cleveland, is likely not sacrificing profits on 80 DeKalb. Rather, its relatively low bonding request per unit likely reflects a smart decision acquiring the property inexpensively in 1989 and seeing (likely, helping) it get rezoned a dozen years later to accommodate residential development, thus boosting the value of the land.
But Ruby will do anything to get her sister back, and when Chloe returns home two years later, a precarious and deadly balance waits. As Chloe flirts with the truth that Ruby has hidden deeply away, the fragile line between life and death is redrawn by the complex bonds of sisterhood.
I did something silly I rang my ex and he spoke to me whilst his new gf was in the background, even though he is my ex I still think he's like a best friend, because a sign of trouble and I'm contacting him to talk to or to help. I need to stop this, I NEED TO LEAVE THIS PLACE, I feel like people I have met in my city that I was born in, these people at first are nice but then they turn into snakes. I need to leave this city, to start a fresh.
9th Course Option B:
All hell broke loose as the Mom completely lost it and grabbed Slappy's hair with a vengeance. Slappy grabbed back and for a moment, they were locked in a battle of the hair grip. In a matter of seconds, these two women had gone from calm Parisians to two shrieking, clawing, punching banshees at each others' throats. The two other members of the Four Mamas wrenched the now flailing Mom out of Slappy's grip and the three of them shot back across the grass, again, moving as one giant khaki pant. And then Slappy did the MOST surprising thing to me. She sat back down calmly, opened her paper back up and simply continued reading. I sat in shock, staring at her and wondering how she could have raised such hell and then just calmly sit back down as though she hadn't just bitchslapped a kid and tried to rip the Mom's face off.
It’s taken me a long time to get to this point where I’ve begun to understand that creativity requires making a mess. You ain’t gonna get it right the first time. In fact, you might not get it right the third, twentieth, or eighty-first time. The trick is to stop focusing on the self and focus on the work. That means it doesn’t matter if you write in the margins, sideways, or upside down. It doesn’t matter if you write absolute garbage until you get to the good stuff.
Maths handout
I voted for Santorum. There's still some slim hope for him to emerge as the (more) conservative alternative to the Mitt Machine. Newt IS bone-tired, looking terribly unhealthy, and making mistakes. And, Newt being Newt, he could implode anyday with something monumentally harmful to his campaign. Plus, Newt really IS NOT more Conservative than Romney if you look at the whole breadth of issues.
100 things
This is how he feels about this:
Whew! What a summer. Seventy-five out of the last ninety days were over ninety degrees in Charlotte. The only thing that kept me cool was the breeze generated by turning the pages of the fabulous flash that came my way via the Dog Days of Summer Flash Contest here at the NOT.
We are girls.
H 85 X W 150 X D 45 (Can be customized to different sizes)
This is my taper week for the Flying Pig. So that means some walking, just not a whole lot. I walked a total of two miles today; to the drugstore and back. It felt kinda weird not going for longer…
Profound withdrawal and isolation are common themes in Murakami’s novels, and I suppose Aomame’s solitude is just another permutation on this theme, but perhaps it was too long and her motivations and musings were not as sound as those of characters in other novels.
More about this next week, with pictures of all the Tags showing the 'Technique' Samples that I have made so far.
I've lost another pound, and next week I'm aiming to be in the "8 stone something" bracket! I can't wait. I have a massive bag of size 8 clothes (that's size 4 if you're in the US) which I'm really looking forward to getting back into. I think it's going to take until the end of the year to reach my target weight of 8 stone though.
My kids and I do not pray together every night at bedtime. Our family does not pray before every meal. For me, prayer is more intimate and more about my relationship with God, my conversation with God. And that's what I teach my kids. If they ask to pray at bedtime or before eating or anytime, I certainly facilitate their request.
Some choice phrases: "Congratulations on your admittance into the Thunderbird Tribe. Your life is going to improve exponentially after donning the sacred colors of the Thunderbird Nation. Be prepared to transcend time and space as you begin a magical journey into manhood/womanhood/tribeshood." They call it a "sacred treaty", but it's supposed to be "funny". Rules include saluting to buffalo and looking for your spirit animal.
And that's exactly what he's doing now. His book-shelving job has been extended into book-repairing and he just loves it. He loves touching the books, holding them, contemplating their titles, admiring their covers...and he loves the little treasures that he finds *in* books sometimes, and he imagines the stories behind the object and the person who left it in the book. He gets to put his music on and be in his own beautiful world of books while he's repairing...and his job is his passion ~ a little piece of heaven for which he gets paid.
Sadly no pics of today's adventures, the whole she-bang was so overwhelming that it didn't occur to us.
Best On-Screen Male: Winner – LSTV (Andrew Seddon)/ Highly Commended – Warwick TV (Matthew Cullum)
In fact, since President Obama took office, nearly four-fifths of all the jobs lost have been in the female-dominated government sector.
The doctor arrived, and he had that look. The look that you see in movies when a doctor is about to tell you some bad news. He continued to tell us that as much as he wanted to help, there was nothing that he could do. That moment I felt my life changing forever. It was time to say goodbye.
bulletin board inside kitchen cabinet
1/3 cup oats
One dreadful sound could the Rover hear;
I have always thought that when a car company advertises a certain model, the primary intention is to sell as many units of that model as possible. It had never occurred to me that a given model might be promoted for marketing purposes other than the goal of necessarily selling that model. "Loss leaders"?-- that is for the local pharmacy; "bait and switch"--that is for the local supermarket. Surely neither of these marketing ploys could have any relevance for the marketing and promotion of an automobile brand.My, oh my -- was I wrong!
Respectfully Submitted,
" I cannot BELIEVE that in that ENTIRE STORE, in that
And what a way to 'get started' this really is, with not only one of their best loved brews involved - but also their very latest.
"If anyone laughs at this ridiculous tie that I'm wearing in 65 years when they see it on the internet, I'll haunt them because I'll be dead by then. I'm posing with my meanest 'I'll be dead by the time you see this on a blog' look right now. Is my zipper undone? This isn't really a tie, it's two large green beans hanging down off my neck. You'll call them something fancy like 'edemame' someday. Stop looking at my large hands and high waist. I'm haunting your basement right now, don't come down here. Boo!"
$1 off Method Laundry Detergent
Ah yes, “hate” what does that mean? Hate, in the new world, now means things which it never did before.
Saturday we dyed eggs. Soon after we started and egg dye got all over clothes and carpet we decided to take the party outside and ditch the clothes.
When our son was on a sailing team a few years ago, I felt the tug at my heartstrings once again, but I let it go as we had house remodeling and things like that requiring our immediate attention, but I think it's time now.
But do not distress yourself with dark imaginings.
Calmness and compassion are the main ideas for me right now. I feel stressed, overwhelmed, and pulled into the vortex of old patterns.
As someone whose name is constantly changed to Diane, Dianna or even Dania, I'm a little bugged about it. (Especially Dania, seeing as how the person who wrote that was a family member.)
Now, tonight, I decide to reach into my flooded purse to retrieve a couple of scratch lottery tickets...once in a blue, blue moon I get an itch and buy a couple of scratch tickets, and every time I do it seems, I win something. So just about 14 minutes ago after I read a story about some guy winning $250,000 I decide to pull out my water-logged tickets and the whole time I'm scratching I'm thinking...I wonder if anyone in the area's ever won anything bigger than $10 on these things, and....Tada! I won $1,000!!
· Look at how and where the shadow of a tree falls. Look in the morning and then revisit it in the afternoon and again later in the day to talk about how it has changed.
What I'm actually spending my time doing (when I'm not laid low by hayfever or distracted by videogames) is working on the book. I'm not doing a lot of editing right now, but I've still got to prepare a preview of book 2 (which is involving a huge amount of work outlining and preparing book 2, work that needs doing but is taking a while) and make a map of the city - which is an insanely finicky job. I hope to have the result to show sometime next week.
He has no use for the religion of fear and equally little for social or moral religion. A God who rewards and punishes is inconceivable to him for the simple reason that a man’s actions are determined by necessity, external and internal, so that in God’s eyes he cannot be responsible, any more than an inanimate object is responsible for the motions it undergoes. Science has therefore been charged with undermining morality, but the charge is unjust. A man’s ethical behavior should be based effectually on sympathy, education, and social ties and needs; no religious basis is necessary. Man would indeed be in a poor way if he had to be restrained by fear of punishment and hopes of reward after death.
Today I mixed up some different patterns in my outfit--stripes on my sweater, anchors on my skirt, and argyle on my knee socks.
My second wish…is that you all come to my funeral – please do! It really will be an occasion to remember. It was planned when I was thirteen, with two girls who were equally as silly as I was/am…and it is set to be terrrrrific! I’m not entirely sure we’ll be able to get John Hannah to read W H Auden’s ‘Funeral Blues’, nor do I think the organisers of the service will deem it appropriate to play the Tenacious D track we were a bit obsessed with at the time…but I hope those girls remember my other wishes (with the addition of a Love Actually style music surprise as I go up the aisle (Kiera Knightley’s wedding)).
Rel's mind filled with images of the sheet of concrete sweeping them off the ledge, or snapping its hinge and taking them with it into the depths of the Abyss. "Will the mechanism work?"
Nancy Pelosi and Democrats in Congress announced on April 19th that they intend to amendment the Constitution. This would grant Congress the power to control political speech of corporations, including those corporations that produce films, newspapers, books, and radio broadcasts. The amendment would reverse the Supreme Court’s decision in Citizens United v. Federal Election Commission in which the High Court ruled that the First Amendment protects the right of free speech for corporations as well as individuals.
To win, you must enter a project based on the guidelines in the challenge and link up to the widget below. Comments are appreciated, but they DO NOT COUNT as an entry!
Then in the afternoon it was the return of the Vintage Mafia's Sunday Sale and Social. Not only is this a great excuse for us to clean out our wardrobes, but we get to eat hot dogs, drink milkshakes, and all our buddies join us in doing so.
or a monster.
Here are the standard ones:
For more details on André’s mission, and to see more of his amazing photography, please visit: www.esa.int/SPECIALS/PromISSe/index.html
While raising money for worthy organisations it gives an unsigned band the chance to improve their profile and have our music heard by many people.
OK, now back to my card. I colored the image with Copic markers, cut it with a die from Spellbinders, and framed it with another, larger die cut. I cut strips of brown (Oh, another "B"!) and green CS and one patterned and embossed dp (from Colorbok 'Sorbet'.) I corner punched the top corner and added the polka dot ribbon. The flowers were all in my stash (I'm using up anything over 6 months old) and I added tiny spots of Liquid Pearls to one flower and to the brown strips.
The ways in which the compounds in chocolate interact with our bodies' systems, from the stomach to the heart, have been an active area of research in recent years. Several studies have found that in small amounts, dark chocolate in particular can help prevent the blood from clumping up, keep the heart healthy and even provide some anti-cancer benefits.
If you have a toddler with a chalk in hand, that may become a different
My dream state seemed to want to make sure I remembered what was happening to me within my sleep time. Not that I fully understood it… but I did not forget any detail or feeling.
According to the publicity material for this project, Williams has referred to Hoods and Shades as his “folk album.” That’s probably because Coffey’s acoustic guitar-playing is prominent on many cuts. But the term folk is pretty misleading. This isn’t “Michael Row the Boat Ashore.”
weather and animals did a number on it.”
When Sally Russick of The StudioSublime put the word out for participants for her One Color Crayon Challenge I signed up for the color Green. Well, at that time I had forgotten that I would be away the weekend of the blog hop with some girlfriends, visiting the Garden of Good and Evil, yes, Savannah GA. But that's okay, I completed my assignment in time and have scheduled this posting to be published on the morning of May 5th.
Local councils are being effectively emasculated by central government bent on ensuring the state has no effective counter to its operation. What municipal responsibilities remain are hedged around with regulations preventing independent action.
On Tuesday, May 29th from 7-9pm, community herbalist and food activists Tony(a) Lemos, director of Blazing Star Herbal School in Ashfield, will begin our community conversation sharing information of how GMO foods impact the development of our kids and the our wellness as adults. — Following Tony(a), Ed Stockman will get to the heart of the issue of GMO foods. His presentation will cover the lack of labeling and regulations of GMO foods, long-term safety studies the FDA overlooks, the prevalence of genetically engineered crops in our food supply, how it contributes to the increase in childhood allergies, and how consumers, especially families, can play an important role in stopping the genetic engineering of our food supply. —Concluding Ed’s presentation, Jennifer Hartley will offer local resources and vehicles of empowerment to our community and families.
As you may recall Kyoungmo Kim of now disbanded Especially When (interview & download link for one of the best songs ever written here) has started anew with Sunkyeol. Eager as I am to learn more about this band that already has had me obsessively playing the same song(s) over and over again, I'm very happy that he took the time to answer a few questions for Indieful ROK:
“I never knew you were a master of black magic, GB,” he told me in awed appreciation.
On Tuesday night a meeting was held in Sheffield to launch the English Democrats' 'Yes' campaigns for the upcoming referendums in Leeds, Wakefield, Bradford, and Sheffield on the question of whether those cities should move to a democratically elected mayoral system.
Being the lazy-ass that I am, I love anything that saves me time, effort or energy. So it should come as no surprise that I love self-foaming cleansers. I’ve been through quite a few, Etude House Acne Foaming Wash , Hada Labo AHA/BHA Exfoliating Face Wash Foam and a couple of Body Shop ones which I never got around to reviewing.
Working from his normal modus operandi, AB first told of the history and etymology of barbecue. Surprising how many ways it is used, noun, verb, adjective. And as all Good Eats fans should know, the method of cooking meat in this manner comes from the native people of the Caribbean and the Europeans "discovery" of the lands. When it comes to producing great barbecue as Alton said, it all comes down four basic things: heat, smoke, meat and time. Anyone who enjoys smoking meat knows how crucial time is to produce quality Q.
The phrases ‘reading action’ and ‘poetry action’ have been specifically created to point awareness toward the fact that self expression, listening, and independently distributing ideas are all indeed actions. One typically may not think of them as such because they are quite miniature in scale. Any type of ‘poetry action’ is profoundly nonheroic. By asserting ‘reading actions’ and ‘poetry actions’ we are enacting a value-system of the nonheroic and instead promoting a value system foregrounding the systemic, the relational.
Well, color me stupid! I just found my "lost" posts. Yeah, they were in my 'edit posts' file; they were labeled 'drafts'. Oh, me. Chalk it up to being new to blogging, inept with computer skills, and just plain old. But I thought I would go ahead and publish the second "lost post". Because you wouldn't want to miss this terrific piece of writing. Really. Yes, I am just kidding. But at least it will catch you up on some things. And I repeated the information on this week's card. So here goes:
He heard a noise behind him and spun around and ran into Lieutenant Frio. Dylan jumped back and fell on the slick floor and the package flew from his hands. The Lieutenant picked it up and he saw her look at the Arizona postmark. His mom’s friend had been too smart to put a return address on the package. Still, he regretted the cop seeing the package and postmark.
Toll-Free: 855-269-3115
Then I got to catch up with a friend and have lunch at the Left Bank Gallery in Palouse. It was really delicious - I had a flatbread chicken tartine.
At least a hundred times I bet,
Drizzle your melted chocolate on top of cookies and popcorn. Let the chocolate set and break apart.
Gonna hit the sack soon, time for a real whole week of work starting from tomorrow. This weekend’s been a pretty fast one, faster than I usually remember it to be. I blame it mostly on some stupid iPhone game that I’ve been hooked on, and man it’s been sucking up all my time and energy. I literally blew away an entire afternoon just playing that stupid game. But yeah, the price you pay for gluing yourself to a sad little screen. Any how, I’m almost done achieving what I wanna achieve and I can finally put that game aside and get on with my life now.
I made it using this tutorial here at M & A Times, which was very good. I followed it exactly (as in, I did not stray from her instructions) because I started on this project after I put Pippo to bed after the Easter Vigil (yes, I felt a little bit like a crazy lady at this point) and didn't trust my tired self to think clearly on my own.
the crickets crick and the owls owl, and together they play
103) Ya know, you are really hot! You must be the real reason for global warming.
everyone was talking about the big Nor'easter coming. all week. snow snow snow. one of my biggest pet peeves are when people get scared about a big "Nor'easter." 90% of the time, the weather people are totally off. also, why does the name "Nor'easter" freak people out so much? it's just a snow storm...coming from the North East. so what?
Only the single underwater light glows,
So the moral of the story is, if you are looking to save money and don't want to ride a bike 56 miles a day start couponing! It is becoming more of a hobby to me and I absolutely cannot get enough of it. I can't believe I used to pay full price for things. Sometimes I do have to bite the bullet and buy things at regular price though and it almost hurts as bad as filling up the car with gas.﻿
2018.***E-XII/3/1969. On the proposal to put an airport in Lake Michigan. Hyde Park Herald, Chicago, Illinois, December 3, 1969, p. 6; Chicago Tribune, December 5, 1969, sec. 1, p. 24; Chicago Daily News, December 5, 1969, p. 14; Chicago Sun-Times, December 16, 1969, p. 35. (Incorporated in Item B-2, above, pp. 267-68 (1975).)
This past weekend, as has been our usual routine lately, we took advantage of moments for discussion. We were making the bed this time, just throwing things out there, talking casually. I don’t know what brought up the subject, but we were talking about divorce. Dave told me that he never
Since the movie was successful enough to warrent another sequel, the producers found that they had painted themselves into a corner with the destruction of the world. Having the trio of chimps go back in time to then-present day Earth was a great idea, but it would have been better if they had anticipated another film while writing the second, and set up the third one all through it. It would have been great seeing the efforts of Milo, Cornelius and Zira as they try to retrieve and repair the original ship, and the tension of their escape as the world is about to end. Just my way of thinking, and it would have made people even more excited for the next movie when the start of it was teased after the ape planet was blown up; and made the ending less depressing.
The third man in the trio — Undine’s beaten-down stock speculator papa doesn’t count except as a cash machine — is Elmer Moffatt, the bumptious nouveau riche, with his red face and shiny pate and slightly-too-tight clothes. Energetic, competitive, aggressive, loud, Elmer is the guy who appears over and over again in anglophone literature of the turn of the century. He is Undine’s true counterpart.
Serve the cooked Latkes immediately on a clean platter or remove the paper towel layer of the baking sheet and put the cooked Latkes onto the baking sheet and keep warm in the oven until serving time.
The menu is what a White House aide dubbed "Super Bowl foods," and foods are favorites from both Packer and Steeler countries--er, Wisconsin and Pennsylvania. There's no guest chef on hand.
I realize I have been posting a ton the past two days, but I am just in the ZONE! I can't help it! I know many of you use my holiday/season themed newsletters so I wanted to share the one I made for Spring! It even has a piece of my Spring clip art pack in it for FREE!
Dream ON..... (Aerosmith)
I have had to improvise with Photoshop to demonstrate the full effect, as the lights don't flash in synchronisation.
Here are the three posts for the simple flannel/fleece baby quilt that I made for Timber.
Frances Wood
I have a philosophy that’s very simple; it’s ‘I don’t play if I can’t win’. I was raised in a competitive household where there are literally no prizes for sitting in the corner. I realised early on in life that being a supporting actress in your own life is not going to get you anywhere. You have to pretend you’re Audrey Hepburn even if you feel like Rosa Klebb. It’s for this reason that I never got into sports at school. Actually this is not the reason; I was emotionally scarred because I was teased by all the boys who could hop faster than I could run. I used to run around hurdles instead of jumping over them and I’d bust open a bottle of Moet when I made it into the long jump pit. I was that girl.
This crew worked hard, toured alot, and didnt have much slack time ... they also infuenced so many other's as well, they were on major film soundtrack's ... and I have seen them on over at least a dozen compilation recording's, they were also into "pro- choice" activism and more. Their sound is great "live" ... I seen them in a venue in the late 1980's (88/89?) with maybe a capacity crowd of about 1000+ only ... but ... this crew has proven time and again, that they can do well in damn near any kind of setting ... their the kind of group that would be ideal for a private party/ gathering ... a large nightclub, or an open roof stadium. And their music is simple rock ... I call it "punk" and some would prefer to put them in another genre, whether it's metal, grunge, alternative, or whatever is popularly fitting of the era. Other than that ... they just kick ass, plain and simple. Enjoy! ....
I have an extremely hectic schedule this year traveling, teaching and creating 17 block tutorials each month. Working on these stitcheries at night help me to unwind. I find the work very relaxing and enjoyable. Hand quilting small projects gives me that same sense of "Calm".
The new trailer, unveiled Wednesday, February 29, exclusively on iTunes, gives fans an exciting look at “Marvel’s The Avengers”—an action adventure of a lifetime—based on the ever-popular Marvel comic book series “The Avengers,” first published in 1963 and a comics institution ever since.
You will notice a round white hole in the center of the blood print. This round white hole is polymerized protein from the breakdown tissues of the reproductive organs as in a male prostate or a female uterus.
That’s it. Its not really a recipe. Its an assembly. Mix with cooked pasta (in the photo above we ate it with semi-wholewheat (don’t ask) fusilli, added some freshly cooked peas, and served scattered with more pine nuts and some extra Parmesan. Job done.
CHOUTEAU – Team officials at Word Fellowship Church have released the 2012 schedule early this mornining, and the fans won’t have to wait long to see their favorite team in action. The Holy Hitters of Word Fellowship Church will take the field next Thursday, May 4 at 7:30pm against Zion.
Flick on the cellphone, tell me the time. I can hop on my bike, ride ten minutes to Manny Brown's, and get a glass of good craft beer. Ride ten minutes more, and even Store #0909 of the Stupid State Store System can offer me a selection of whisky that would make what I could find most places 25 years ago look sick.
Distress Inks-Stormy Sky, Bundled Sage, Faded Jeans, Chipped Sapphire
There are many pros and cons pertaining to the internet. The ease of accessing information, instant messaging, and banking are the basic necessities of business today. The cons of the internet are that there are sex offenders; illegal downloads of music, pornography of children, viruses, scams.
In Jesus’ teachings you can see it in the Gospel according to Thomas. But you have to really dig deep to find that thread in the West. In India, in the Upanishads and the Vedanta and the Bhagavad Gita, it is very much explicit. Now, pantheism sounds very good. But it’s only part of the story. It’s a good way to worship, it’s a good way to bring spirituality into your daily life, because it is good to acknowledge that there is spirit in everything. But if we just see the diversity, see the God in everything, but don’t see the God which is beyond every particular thing, then we are not realizing our potential. We are not realizing our Self. And so, truly, Self-realization involves seeing this pantheistic aspect of reality, but also seeing the transcendent aspect of reality.
Repent:
He was running out of road, he was running out of breath
So imagine my surprise when I arrived at the Post Office on April 17th, camp chair in hand, only to find a mere ONE PERSON in line ahead of me! Was I in the right place? Had I somehow experienced time travel only to miss the deadline? I asked the clerk behind the counter why he thought the Post Office was so empty and he explained to me that everyone had shown up the previous day.
This week...not so fun. Steve had his surgery and it has been a long and draining week. But he is doing great, is home and is on his way to recovery.
Right now I feel - just like a leaf on a breeze
Since the earliest times Jade seems to have have had a special place in Chinese culture. It is thought to have been a link between man and the gods and still continues to carry connotations of royalty, wisdom and longevity.
But, luckily they scrounged around and found an actual measuring tape.
He is both justice and goodness, in perfect fullness, a ring of pure and endless light, too complete for the crescent human mind to contain.
No Nazis or UAF/SWP infiltrators will be tolerated on the EDL Bradford demo.
Are you out in the world?
Thank you--and may you and yours be well.
Story by Roy.
MyPlaySucks: folds
I don’t feel it’s all that important what I like. Many of the programmes I like I made myself!
Wine and strawberries-yummmm!
we spent the holiday with my parents. After dinner, Mom
Kola nut and cola beverages should be kept away from dogs, cats, and other domestic animals. The theobromine in kola nut (and in chocolate as well) can be fatal to these pets because they metabolize it much more slowly than humans.
Then, in the wee small hours of this morning, I realized something: ‘Time to Make the Brownies’ started out as a way to tell stories about creating the space to do what matters most with my kids. But really, it can be about so much more. In then end, for me, this blog is a metaphor for making time to find and create the kind of life that I’ve always wanted. It’s about closing the gap between who I’ve become and the vague, but persistent vision of the person I know I can be.
Half Blood Blues by Esi Edugyan
Further complicating the mystery of missing giant bones is the following exerpt from an article I wrote which included the inquiries of the late zoologist Ivan T. Sanderson, best known for his interest in the legends regarding America’s Bigfoot and the Abominable Snowmen alleged to reside in the Himalayas:
Ward said in addition to the cruelty to animals issue, there is concern about the large amounts of money that are bet on cockfighting and the concern that the birds could spread diseases.
Dimensions: 7x3
Now my sister has a little boy. He is only six months old this year, but the thought of watching his Christmas joy in the years to come already makes me break into a huge smile.
Thanks, Steve, and please thank Liz as well–she was terrific.
So put me on! Don’t be afraid!
Made it through the bad luck day unscathed. My boss is back directing traffic this week, so some of the stress is lifted. You would think having the boss gone would be a stress relief, but it wasn’t. As a newbie I need his guidance and support. I am sure soon, I will wish him gone like the others do.
Was the likelihood of passage of health care reform increased by making a backroom, apparently corrupt deal with drug makers?
Sam is the same. She is someone who is perfectly suited to talking about the passion required to make good beer and to watch her engage with the punters one-on-one is to watch someone doing just exactly what they love doing – and doing it well. There is so much of her own personality and style in her beers and in the way she approaches the challenges of brewing and you can’t help thinking that she moves a fair bit of beer just because she is able to instantly make friends. She will be the first to admit that she often has to stop and pinch herself that she actually gets paid to do all this.
That event was greeted with suitably cautious optimism, but subsequent developments - a grudging increase from one woman to four, including one of the orchestra's four concertmasters - do not suggest that any essential change has taken place. That's why the subject is still alive 14 years later.
Finally, he was forced to sign a written confession to a range of alleged crimes, including attempted kidnap of a police officer. He was cleared of that felony in October, but convicted on lesser charges of attending illegal political rallies and spreading false information about the government, and sentenced to five years in jail.
2-4 clove garlic, chopped
There was a Capitol Museum on the upper level of the building which was great. We got to see exhibits on our local wildlife, waterways, and industries. We also were able to see exhibits depicting the history of voting in our state as well as some background on some of our most famous people. This being Georgia and all I guess I should not have been surprised to see a painting of Dr. Martin Luther King Jr. on the 1st floor of the capitol building in the same hall as all the past Governors. After all he was from Atlanta, Ga. We also saw some things on Jimmy Carter our 39th president who is from Plains, Ga. Ironically he grew up on a peanut farm and that happens to be a our state Crop. lol!
We all appreciate comments that you leave for each of us so very much! Hugs!
The state joy and happiness if ever the things deliver to people is newly found.
And then I walked away. I never touch them, I leave them alone, to do their soaking and whatever else they want to do when I am not looking! I watched a movie, chatted with my brother about computer problems, and then remembered my poor skeins!
3. Pet rats
I am not ready to "kill" Santa Claus for my kids, but I like the idea of educating them about the original St Nikolaus. I only have one Santa decoration and it reminds me of our days in Germany so I am not going to put it away.
Like many people I have a Starbucks addiction, unlike many people mine is far less caffeine driven and has a lot more to do with the routine; unsurprisingly after spending countless hours swimming back and forth over a black line I have become a creature of habit. When I lived in NYC I would get the same breakfast every day (sesame bagel with cream cheese) from the BEST bagel shop of all time, Absolute Bagels—it got to the point that I would walk over on a Sunday when the line was out the door and the man behind the counter would see me, make my bagel and let me cut the entire line—talk about perks of being a regular!
She has been staying with Jesse and I while things calm down
To use a wine bottle, you have to break it in order to use it (unless you want to just melt it into a spoon holder). But reshaping it into something completely different requires putting the bottle into a plastic bag and hitting it against a wall or floor until you hear it shatter. Then comes the hard part - handling the broken shards of glass and finding the pieces you need to form a pattern. Blood shed from occasional pricks on sharp, irregular edges is a given, but less so the more experienced you get. Nest bowls are fun to make, as are suncatchers.
I was wondering if you might help me. (serious cringing inside)
My stomach reminds me I skipped lunch today, and no dinner is waiting for my dear husband.
Catherine Booth equips us this way: “Whatever the particular call is, the particular sacrifice God asks you to make, the particular cross He wishes you to embrace, whatever the particular path He wants you to tread, will you rise up, and say in your heart, ‘Yes, Lord, I accept it; I submit, I yield, I pledge myself to walk in that path, and to follow that Voice, and to trust Thee with the consequences’? Oh! but you say, ‘I don’t know what He will want next.’ No, none of us know that, but we know we shall be safe in His hands.”
two other cars right in front of the building. I thought ” boy that jeep looks like our jeep”. Then I thought “huh, that dog looks like Bo”. Then ” oh wow that is Bo!”. The jeep had slid down three rows and parked itself in between two other cars. Bo was in the backseat with his front feet on the console. I could see his head with his big Boston Terrier ears swiveling from right to left. Reading his body language he was saying ” who is driving? who is driving?”. No doubt he would have been at the steering wheel trying to drive in the next few minutes if the car had not come to a safe stop at the curb.
My mojo has been suffering just lately so I've made these notebooks using the 3 Little Piggies images and my paw print embossing folder.
At the SFX Weekender I popped in on the launch of Andy Remic's next Combat K novel Cloneworld, and part of the launch included this simply AWESOME book trailer.
I also bought some lovely little embroidery hoops for some pictures I want to make for an arts trail event I am doing. I really do need to get off the computer and make something. Ah now I understand the button tidying. Its a distraction from actually sitting down and making something. It all makes sense now!
Finally I learned that you can put a huge project on hold within one afternoon
Reading will change your life!
Despite my moping about the end of the night, Ariel and I were very productive: churning out 3600 words for our fanfiction story and another 4000 for PP. It’s been a very intense writing session, which might be the only reason why I was able to write the death as I did. It also means that I need to go sleep before I eat more chocolate and cry into my pillow.
6 assistance
It is about over 2 feet by 1 foot. It's huge!! Amazingly we didn't tear into when came home. It's still sitting here in the plastic wrap. The pie will probably wait til tomorrow's breakfast too. (Note to self. Put the pies away so Bright Eyes doesn't help herself.)
Score: Carrie-Ann=8, Len=7, Bruno=8 for a total of 23 and a grand total of 60
When I got home from work yesterday the first thing I did was choose a fabric to tea stain. I knew the threads I was waiting on were coming soon and I wanted to be ready. This 32 count Lugana fit the bill. I guess I didn't have to choose such a large piece of fabric...but I wanted extra!
This week, it will be exactly fifteen years since that trip to Gran Canaria. My life has changed so much since then, that I'd barely recognise the woman I once was. Throughout that time, Francesca Ferrari has been my friend and for every one of those years, Fast Love has been the soundtrack to the continuing wonder of her friendship.
News and views of Constance Cumbey concerning "Radical Middle", New Age Movement, Communitarianism, "planetary humanism," "global governance," European Union, Javier Solana, Jeremy Rifkin, "New Age Politics," law in the USA, combined with life in general -- sometimes humorous, sometimes not!
of luck thrown in as well. Some say
Here's the deal. I like to write and if I write about anyone specific, it is usually about my own kids. This blog is about our family with a strong emphasis on celebrating our lives as unschoolers. I could choose to not write any more but sometimes I have things to say that seem to strike a chord with a parent of young children or even with someone who has been unschooling for years. That is really why I share bits of our lives here and so I'm back to do that for at least a little while longer. At this time in my life, my kids are 18 and 21 and I have some very strong opinions about unschooling, schools, college and a host of other things. So, you may find some of those opinions expressed here along with the usual photos and reporting about what's up with us.
On the quirky side, the new rules require each party submitting a digital version to certify that the document has been scanned for viruses and that no virus has been detected. It is encouraged, but not required, that the PDF documents be saved with commenting enabled. Only if an original word processing file or redacted copy thereof is not available may a scanned PDF image be included in a digital version of a filed brief or appendix.
So be it.
09/02/09 SELL XAUUSD 0.01 972.00 10/15/2010 1366.86 -394.29
Same as the last post, too many witbiers.
5. Bulk pinto beans, 4 lbs. for $1 at Fiesta (through 8/3/10)
What could be more ridiculous?
3. Counting of Votes start at 11pm and beamed live on all National TV and Radio Stations and computation takes place; and
A long time ago, I started to reread the various Chaosium supplements dedicated to what Keith Herber christened “Lovecraft Country”—that area around northeastern Massachusetts that served as home for many of Lovecraft’s tales. Chaosium produced several supplements covering this area and I wanted to revisit them as an excuse to immerse myself in something other than dank
Here is my Chocolate snow skin moon cake with assorted nuts fillings.
Then Madzivanyika took this woman and gave her to Mhembere the son of
Eli, Brandon Jacobs and Ahmad Bradshaw will be fronted by the reunited, and still great G-Men of the Offensive Line. Shaun O'Hara, the Center, will return after a long nagging foot injury. David Diehl will have another week and a game under his belt with no set-backs. This formidable Offensive Line is finally back together again (Shawn Andrews should be available for reserve duties also) after many weeks apart. That's great news for the running holes Jacobs will be running through; great news for the blockers Bradshaw will be following and cutting behind; and great news for Eli's passing lanes and protection. If you're the Eagles Defense, that's bad news for you.
At one point an 86 regular who we know as Biff Pelican (because that’s what he once introduced himself as), boarded the train carrying a half-finished bottle of fruity lexia and wearing the expression of a man not entirely sure where he was, what he was doing there or why his trousers were sodden. (He was also wearing what looked like carbonara sauce, and a few pieces of penne pasta in his beard, if that helps.) Within seconds of sitting down, he was face to face with the angry tram bully. Usually it is Biff Pelican making preposterous announcements to commuters and asking questions with no sensible answer (once I saw him bowl a loaf of bread down the aisle like a cricket ball and yell “Good area, Biff!” after it hit a woman hard in the leg), but he was out of his league here. It was like that horror movie sequel which starts with the giant sea monster from the first film being devoured whole by a sea monster twice its size. Biff was off at the very next stop.
The next day, we decided to branch out and go to a place we hadn't been to before. So, we headed out of the city to Fort Langley, which is considered the "Birthplace of British Columbia." It's actually a historic park, sort of like Williamsburg on a smaller scale. We really loved it because the interpreters really engaged us, you could touch everything, and there were lots of history bits that we had never heard during our other explorations. Because the history of BC centers around the fur trade, it was all new to us.
Avengers Disassembled- It sucked, people hated it, it went away.
article by
oh and she actually looks at you now which just steals my heart away
For example if you and your fiancé love to cook, you may want to choose Williams-Sonoma. If you're looking for furniture, Pottery Barn would be a good choice. If you need items for every room go with a department store like Bloomingdale's.
My nine-year-old did the poem collage below. He picked his favorite topic, candy. (Yes, I know that "candy's" should be "candies" but we don't worry about spelling errors at this point in the game, remember?) His forms include an acrostic, a haiku, an ode, and a simple ABAB rhyme scheme.
I smiled. I had perfect teeth, like the ones in the commercials. People liked my smile. “At least I don’t pretend to be something I am not.”
Mr Watson: Actually, Chairman, we have not, but I respect you. Mr Murdoch, your wife has a very good left hook.
-Change the weather dearest...but WHY..look outside...its the most glorious November we had in ages..
I got an email on Tuesday from his Grandson that he passed away Monday night.
As some of you remember, I promised I would start answering your questions here in my blog, and I'm going to begin with this one:
So that's the first four hours of a total rehearsal time of 140 hours over the next two months done. It would have been literary dynamite if it had been 127 Hours, but you can't have everything. I'm looking forward to the next 136, and desperately hoping I can live up to it.
Karen Kingsbury is one of my favorite authors. I have read almost every one of her books. I read her book Waiting For Morning a couple years ago, but when I had the chance to read it again for review, I took it. It was just as good the second time! Hannah Ryan unexpectedly loses her husband and daughter to a drunk driver, and her other daughter survives the accident with injuries. Hannah becomes so obsessed with making sure that the driver gets his punishment that she forgets about God and neglects her surviving daughter. Hannah must learn how to forgive and trust in God again. I love how Karen Kingsbury uses a crisis to show how God can bring someone to a place of forgiveness and peace.
to flow
We have a guest coming to visit. My friend Kristin, who has been working out on an island in the very far north arctic called Jan Mayen, is back from her 6 month stint and will be here for a few days, checking on her flat, doing job interviews, etc. In honor of her visit, we finally got around to buying that blow up mattress we have been needing (don't have storage or space for a full bed, but I think those blow up ones are comfy and this one is 19 inches thick!). So now we can actually have people spend the night, or, as is more likely, have a place for people to pass out after a night of partying. (And of course, as a place for a bedroom-banished 'in the doghouse' Richard to go in times of marital strife.)
“Keep walking and have Faith.” I made it.
Our Saturday night dinner was at Au Vieux Comptoir. We really like that place. This is a picture of our hands and plates and things. Those are my scallops in front of me -- directly across from me are Al's veal kidneys. Al's a disturbed individual. We sat outside and drank a ton of wine (literally, maybe?)
"Just left the Presidents birthday party at the White House. Herbie Hancock played, Stevie Wonder sang and yes they did the electric slide. A great night." Rock wrote (sic).
But more than that his entries reveal snippets about the social history of the time which I think is important to preserve. He talks about the weather, the environment and people of the day and because of Koichi’s lack of the command of English it is quite quirky. There are a lot of humorous bits too.”
A renewed appetite for more riskier currencies, sparked by encouraging manufacturing data in Germany, the US and China, took the Australian dollar to a five-month high. The rally on Thursday led the local currency upwards by more than one US cent to an …
Dangled on steely fishing line
Rounding out the whole scene is a small but stalwart cohort of regulars. When I say “regulars,” I don’t mean folks who show up to pick and grin every Tuesday; I refer to customers who should have plaques with their names engraved on them affixed to their stools. Different day; same stools. In truth, in my wide travels, I’ve never found denizens of public houses to be the most welcoming sorts. After all, for all they know, you might want their stool. In this regard, Boston is no different, even though it is said to be home to the prototype for the bar in Cheers, “Where everybody knows your name.”
Here is the way I made the cake:
I try a couple different compromises, but am only greeted with excuses about why she can’t play in this park. Almost everything that comes out of her mouth is clearly a lie.
The ‘Bar’ section features the restaurant’s famed bar nibbles, from crowd-pleasers of pork crackling and scotch eggs, to more unusual fried snacks made with bits that would be normally be thrown away – broad bean pods, salmon skins and scallop frills. The tasty Quail’s Eggs Shooters (inspired by a South East Asian version served at NYC’s Fatty Crab) were ridiculously easy to make and rather addictive, although a bit messy to eat – my clumsy fingers kept crushing the delicate shells when I tried to ease the egg shots into my mouth.
She tried to turn and felt her body burn.
Obviously I don't get out much so you can't take my word for it. So when you go see it, let me know what you think. There is a scene with a snake that is pretty funny. (I hate snakes more then Indiana Jones.)
Today our talented Maven Erin has a wonderful tutorial for you...So here is Erin
"So where did you get those Union Jack hats?"
March 3, 2009
has gotten longer,
Damphyr, Ford Lenox had waited three hundred years for an ancient prophecy to be fulfilled allowing his destined mate to assume her rightful place at his side.
For the Swiss Meringue Buttercream:
That she loved those days that you prayed that it would rain.
And we have men, a particularly egregious subset of Man, constantly in the news for their irresponsible behavior. Not a day goes by that, from some corner of the globe, comes a report that a male has done something wrong. A crazy guy in China has broken into a school and knifed dozens of helpless children. A slacker dude in Berlin carelessly tosses his burning cigarette from a train and starts a fire. A well-meaning husband in my own hometown puts a dirty dish in the left side of the sink when he’s been told a thousand times to rinse it first in the right side, because he should know by now — after living in the same house for 15 years — that’s where the garbage disposal is.
Stuffed Portobello Mushrooms with Feta and Almonds
And be dead and gone
There's probably a Thai girl behind that tiger
Oh, won’t you people in government ever learn?
It is clear that the wild popularity of such a blog would rapidly lead, through inexorable physical forces, to my domination of the world's economic, political, technological, militaristic, and whatever-else-you-can-think-of systems.
The last time Alec Baldwin hosted – the season finale of 09/10 – was the worst episode he ever hosted, and that is saying something, considering that he did host during the notorious 94/95 season. And the Baldwin episode before, with the Jonas Brothers, wasn’t that great either. So it was nice to see a return to typical Baldwin episode-level form. I am unusually excited for this season, and I don’t have much of a rational explanation for why I feel that way. There have been no cast changes, nor have there been any other significant changes, so one would figure the show should be about the same as last year. But I remain optimistic for this season, thanks to this solid first episode. Most of the sketches were solid, and the subpar sketches generally were not too one-note and unoriginal. And this was the most receptive SNL audience I have witnessed in years. The support of your fans can go a long way, so I’m going to take a cue from this audience and cheer whenever I can this season.
This is one of the first quilts I ever started. It's all flannel and it's for the Hubs. He would be thrilled to finally have this one finished especially considering I started making it for him fifteen years ago...
5. You are the most shameless shabbes goy President America has ever had.
We stayed there the rest of the show and then got up and walked back to the BP station. We called our cabbie but he said he'd just gotten home. He told us to wait at the station and we'd easily get another taxi. But the only 'taxi' that showed up was a guy in an SUV with a handmade sign in the window that said, "shuttle." He said he'd charge us $75 to take us back to the hotel. Considering we'd gotten a ride to the show for $38 in a legitimate taxi, we said we'd pass. Then the guy said, "Come on, it's negotiable," opening his door and beckoning us to get in. We got out of there pretty fast. We called the taxi company and they told us to walk all the way back to Union Avenue. It was a bit of a hike, but we tried to stay with the other people walking around since it was dark and kind of creepy in the area. Finally we made it back to Riverside and Union and got a taxi right away. Despite the fact that the car had a loud knocking when we went around corners, and seemed like a wheel might fly off when we got on the interstate, we made it back to the hotel for another $38.
My Babushka’s Split Pea Soup
So she didn't hear a great joke and created a heap of bad karma for herself.
The second two ‘looks’ were put together with the idea of ‘similarities and differences’ at the back of my mind – ergo the two sets of shirt and shorts with a hat, but presented in contrasting colour shades.
- Tiger Woods cameo as the sound guy (or... his creepy self)
Turkey Tacos, corn
Now what to do with them??
In 16 years I have learnt more and grown more and suffered more than I’ve ever imagined possible.
That was the moment the hostess finally found me. Ms. Brigitte had been a military wife for many years and instantly made me feel at ease. “What a beautiful pie you made! I’m so glad you are here!” She then circled the room with her arm linked in mine introducing me and engaging others in fun conversation. The evening continued with beautiful alternating rounds of singing and more laughter and stories.
I’m sure I’ll go pretty much crazy from working on the achievements, but I’ve gotten quite a few under my belt so far, including my fishing turtle and my sewer rat:
It has been a long summer, with the hot, humid weather persisting up until this last week of September. With the air conditioning on, the windows have been shut tight, occasionally being opened at night when the temperatures promise to be below 90 degrees.
PAGES does cost $9.99 per download. It is well worth the money if your school, or you, are Mac compatible. My students can word process with this app and then my iPad2s are set up with the capability to email documents. Students can work and email me their responses or keep them right on the device.
The jury heard how she was raped and forced to have sex with numerous men by the 59-year-old defendant - the only one of the 11 who cannot be identified.
How strong is your plot?
For those who wish also to support change in the world (that's me), emotional affinity comes easily between you and your peers. From time-to-time this year, step back and reflect on the deeper purpose of your life's work. Be sure to make decisions that match your own objectives, values and goals, and don't allow yourself to be swayed by others desires. Maintain your individuality. Getting in touch with your dreams will help you know which direction is best to take in your effort to expand your beliefs and be of service in a much larger way.
On the quilty-artsy side, I have been working. Doing some customer stuff, and attempting to work on my JTA project which is due on Wednesday. This block is cubism, don't worry I'll have a blog post about it - and no, I'm no where near done! You can check out the last block (fauvism) here.
Geej: Do you really like this?
You glorify the death of children as “reproductive health” just as Ahaz,
Robert Jackson
Hello Friends. Greetings from Luang Prabang in Laos. Have you missed me? I've missed you. Truly.
But why would a fine, upstanding man like Brad Hintz want to defend the 666 guys in Goldman Sachs? Could it be because Brad is a crook himself?
Maureen Robertson, a resident at Garden Village said, “This is a special day for me, I have never heard of Bush Radio before and I knew nothing about it; but here I am today at my old age enjoying my time with Bush Radio, meeting you people. This is really the best thing that has happened to me, thank you Bush Radio.”
C'mon, F-V Independent if not mine, at least publish something here. Because, if I'm the *only* person writing and you're still not publishing, then I'm really crestfallen.
As you might expect, Rena is threatened by Liana, and doesn't want her ruining the cushy position she has within the Amazonian hierarchy. And with good reason, not only is Liana gorgeous, she's scrappy; and I don't mean the kind of scrappy you can get down at the dollar store, I'm talking raised in the jungle by wild animals scrappy. Sure, she doesn't know how to sneak up on people (all her attempts to be sneaky in this film end in failure) and she might not be able to read (jungle women and book learning are a lethal combination). But when it comes to one-on-one confrontations, Liana will straight-up kick your ass into next Tuesday, or Wednesday, or maybe, if you really piss her off, next Thursday, Either way, when the dust settles, you'll be in a completely different realm after Liana is done with you.
Hugs and love to you all....I hope that you had a chance to take a break from your crazy lives to take five minutes (or hours like me) and just relax.
At the fountain
Derek Luyt, an analyst with the Public Service Accountability Monitor, also said the money could be better spent elsewhere.
I've learned, these past few days, what I should have known. On days that I only started up the computer once, and spent at most a half hour online, I truly enjoyed myself. I was anxious and a bit panicky about not being able to check my email every ten minutes.....but besides that it was good. :) On days where I slipped and spent most of my time, from waking to sleep, either online or watching tv...I didn't accomplish anything, I felt achey, I ate a lot, and it was hard to fall asleep.
1. Microwave orange candy melts and a 1/4 cup of the shortening. Microwave in 30 seconds intervals, stirring each time, until melted.
I love this stuff! It's not a lipstick or a lipgloss or a lip tint oranything like it.
The ‘real world’ of Vermeer’s pictures is the world the pictures themselves inhabit, a world of painting; and painting was, for him, an exact and specific activity. In refusing to be ruled by social or commercial aspirations, Vermeer was able to use his paintings as a workplace, his laboratory for constant pictorial research. The meticulousness of this work is above all the expression of a need that is personal, individual and intimate. (p.16)
This is the third book in Anne MacCaffrey’s Dragonriders of Pern series, which technically counts as science fiction since Pern is an alien planet. But the Dragonrider books have a definite feel of a fantasy about them with their glittering dragons, fierce fire-lizards, and medieval society, so you'll find few spaceships and gadgets here. Although the plot is quite complicated, you don’t have to read the first two books to understand the background because there’s a detailed summary of what has gone before at the front. Also, this is a new story about Jaxom and Ruth, whereas the first two books concentrated on different characters, so it reads well on its own.
We have to revisit the issue this year – in September, it seems.
It may be that I am brain-washed and I just don't know the facts;
"Nah, dat'll offend people who don't celebrate no holidays."
Benicio Del Toro, Che
I'm also reading Eavan Boland's A Journey with Two Maps: Becoming a Woman Poet; I am a huge fan of Boland's poetry, and her prose is beautiful, too. If you are interested in Boland's development as a poet--a female, Irish poet--this is the book for you.
Death Race
John reminds us that our love, like God's, is not complete unless it goes through us to another person. It's not just about saying you love someone, it's showing you love someone. This can be as simple as showing up. Amy Sullivan just wrote a post regarding this, it is well worth the read. We always think that this means going and "taking over" to show our love in action. But love is a lot of times expressed in the simple things - a giggle; a hug; a prayer. This week I was asked if there was anything that I needed by someone from my church family. Just being asked showed her love and compassion for me. She showed up. The visiting pastor this week told a story of when he and his wife had heard the "A" word in regards to their son. They phoned a friend (another pastor), he and his wife came over with pizza and beer and sat on the floor and listened and prayed. The visiting pastor said that he didn't remember anything they had said, but he always remembered that they showed up. They showed their love just being there.
Rational Dialogue: I am tired. Really, really tired. This means my body needs a rest. I didn’t overeat so there is no need to worry. There are many days where I am very active so it is a good thing to give my body a rest. Besides I know from experience if I exercise when I am tired I don’t enjoy it and then it becomes something I dread instead of enjoy.
8. Bake for 20-25 minutes. Remove and let cool on a wire rack. Slice and serve.
Winners will be announced at The Twinery & Nikki Sivils on Tuesday, April 3rd.
This is a great dish for brunch or lunch dish for a lazy Sunday. Serve with tomato soup if it’s hot outside – gazpacho if it’s cold – and enjoy!
3. Find Focus Groups: Search in your area for studies, or for companies needing products tested. You complete a quick survey, and if you qualify, you participate and get paid! Some of these require you to actually attend studies. From what I’ve seen, they are usually on the weekends.
i know i'm so so behind. mom sent her camera- arrived friday! YAY! i'll have a wip monday since i'm slacking. i hope you haven't given up on me, chickadees!
But I can't quite place him.
I'm telling it like it is, I've got my way and these are my fucking thoughts for you,
. . he is one of the few non super powered characters in the DC Universe who can stand face to face with Superman and still look like an absolute badass. Others who could pull it off include Batman (ofcourse), Rick Flag and none other then Amanda Waller.
So Malthusianism, in a crude sense, keeps reappearing in these debates, but the real question is not about panicking in the face of future population growth or immigration, but how to invest in the genius of urbanism. How to make suburbs, like those of Los Angeles, function as cities in a more classical sense. There's an absolute, essential need to preserve green areas and environmental reserves. A city can’t operate without those. Of course, the pattern everywhere in the world is for poverty – for housing and development – to spill over into crucial watersheds, to build up around reservoirs and open spaces that are essential to the metabolism of the city. Even this astonishing example in Mumbai, where people have pushed so far into the adjacent Sanjay Gandhi National Park that slum dwellers are now being eaten by leopards – or Sao Paulo, which uses astronomical amounts of water purification chemicals because it’s fighting a losing battle against the pollution of its watershed.
My Final Thoughts
Finish my Masters
- Efforts to improve bike parking in Crown Heights are continuing with a community survey of the area to determine where bike racks are most needed this Saturday, March 3, from 2-5pm. Surveying will include taking measurements and speaking with local businesses about supporting bike parking in front of their shops. If you'd like to take part, email organizers Judy or Chris with your availability - even half an hour helps! Also, for those who are tethered to their keyboards, you can sign the online petition in support of more bike parking for the area. We just got a series of the new racks on Dean Street, and they look quite handsome, if I do say so myself.
We look forward to seeing you all there!
But it’s all in a good cause, isn’t it? Ah yes, all for…
I know these awards really get around, so I am sorry if I am re-giving a previously given person one of these awards. Just think of it as making you extra awesome! Also, I promise, more updates very soon!!!
It doesn’t really hold magic but it does hold something just as powerful; mementos and memories that with the right amount of childhood innocence and imagination become magical.
During an interview with host Redi Tlhabi, Mthethwa barely referred to Radebe’s subsequent letter to the police, dated 19 March, which recommended that Mdluli should face criminal charges for fraud.
Your home will be filled with the amazing aroma of garlic and rosemary when you make this dish. And because the chicken has been marinating all day, it is incredibly tender, juicy and flavorful.
The Thai Green curry is made using a paste made by a woman I know
As far as pinning “The Best” label on one or the other, I think that’s silly. They are both masterpieces. And at first glance they seem too different to even invite comparison. But consider the following:
Must stop being lazy.
I mean if you are calling from the bank and you have obtained the info from the form, when you called a person verifying information, isn't that should be reading out the same in order to be verified? Believe this is a chicken and egg thing to discuss...
The Austin event marks the second stop on a national tour organized by the Prosecutorial Oversight coalition, which includes the death row exoneree John Thompson, who was stripped of $14 million in civil damages for prosecutorial misconduct by the U.S. Supreme Court in Connick v. Texas; the Innocence Project; the Veritas Initiative, Northern California Innocence Project’s prosecutorial accountability program; the Innocence Project of New Orleans; Voices of Innocence; and local partners, the Texas Center for Actual Innocence; and the Actual Innocence Clinic at the University of Texas School of Law.
I was the only one in my Korean class, so the teacher and I got pretty close. This was the one that speaks Japanese, so she was just throwing grammar patterns at me, knowing that because of my Japanese background I would get them. She kept telling me that I’m really good at Korean and she seemed impressed. When I got something right, she would clap her hands and tell me how good I was. It was kind of like being a child again. While I didn’t think I was doing anything extraordinary (mostly because if it takes me longer than a few seconds to come up with an answer, I feel like I’ve failed), apparently she’s used to dealing with idiots so a moderate level of skill makes her happy. I guess. FUNNY STORY – she also told me that she wasn’t actually married, that she’d just told the class that so they would treat her like an elder and not like a friend. I was then sworn to secrecy – WE ARE NOW BESTIES. Just kidding. But I do get a huge kick out of her confidence.
Apple cider vinegar, to taste
Now, that money doesn’t just sit there… It is invested. It gains interest. It builds up extreme wealth – months or years of interest and capital gains on investments from that originally taxpayer funded money. This is all transpired digitally, of course.
Which was nowhere near 300 bucks! In fact, mine came in at 1/10 the cost- 30 dollars!! Shewee- that sure is sweet! This is one of those projects that I just wanted to see IF I could do it, ya know? I feel pretty good about its new home, too. It's hard to decorate with vaulted ceilings; hard to find items the right scale.
1. Announce what the colour of the vestments will be. Ta-dah! I told you they would be purple!
unfortunately this is a trait my kids have inherited!~
also, i want/need: one of those dark blue s.h.i.e.l.d uniforms and loki’s skirt thing.
“I was just kidding Ma,” Piper whined like a little boy in trouble. Then he and Mike were ushered out of the kitchen.
There, you should know what I mean now.
- whizz it all up with a hand held blender
However, there was one that stood above the others. This one truly surpassed everyone else in awfulness for one simple brilliantly terrible reason: part of it was written in rhyming verse.
your wife
The Rollercoaster of Stress has been ricocheting around the twisted track at full speed this year.
''I don't think that people watch others on YouTube because of how
That’s a slight setback from the last update on Title III. In a series of research briefs on Title III that were released by the Education Department in May 2010, analysts said that 11 states met their accountability goals for English-language learners in the 2007-08 school year.
Unemployed still. This is becoming really old.
It certainly would have been great, during my visit to the Bay, to catch up with poet-essayist-fine coffee brewer Robin Tremblay-McGaw. But our paths didn't cross. Blame capitalism. More specifically, Right to Work (not write to work) laws like those being forced down the gullets of working people in the midwest right now. Work getting in the way. No matter how much one enjoys one's job (a rarity, but I suspect we both do), it still sucks that our lives become so truncated and often desperate... Anyway...Then, oh, yesterday I believe, I wake up to see Robin's written a mini-exegesis on Occultations, quoted from it, and overall had some deeply giving and insightful things to say (again, the question of writing publicly thru doubt, and in common, comes up--writing under constant, common yet also commonly illusory pressures--the forms that make our bodies legible as such, and conversely, and that shape, then, the form our conversations take, and conversely...).
For your convenience, here is a little forward-dated blurb stating how far back I've finished uploading files from my old banned account:
“If you are collector, let other people share your pride and joy. Don't sprinkle your collection out of sight in a meaningless jumble. Notice how groups of small objects, when they are well arranged, become important and effective. Remember that repetition is a form of emphasis. Collect what you will, but see to it that you arrange your hobby to its best advantage.”
And finally, the Water Nymph (or “Narf”) named Story. And the weary, plodding apartment caretaker.
Reprint of the April 1936 issue of The Spider pulp magazine is a dark, apocalyptic action novel that's hard to top for sheer slam-bang nihilism and grimness... modern action novels would never go as far as this. Dick Wentworth, a.k.a. The Spider, takes on an evil terrorist called The Plague Master, who infects New York City's water supply with cholera, just because the mass deaths will make the city easier to loot! The Spider blasts away with a .45 in each fist to bring the sicko and his henchmen to justice, while trying to lead millions of thirst-crazed New Yorkers to safety through an empty city lit by thousands of corpse-fires. The body count here is over 30,000! Never lets up and delivers horror-tinged action by the truckload. It's unbelievable that they came up with good guys who'd execute citizens for drinking contaminated water. And Batman's supposedly dark...
-back in the ring Y2J gets a two count before he puts Punk in a rear chin lock.
For the fifth and final disbursement, worth $5 million in city funds, Forest City would have to itemize not less than $15 million in "Eligible State Project Costs" and would have to have an accountant certify that the developer had paid or incurred total project costs of not less than $100 million during the "Third Contribution Period."
Peyton! Your wife is from Memphis! You went to school in Knoxville! Your family lives in New Orleans which is a heckuva lot closer to Nashville than to DENVER.
I don’t know whether it was the fact that the title of the novel wasn’t mine, or that I was so stunned to have a 'commended' that made me freeze in the chair.
Back to Rom.1; Paul describes the son as one who, “…was declared to be Son of God…” “Declared” comes from ὁρίζω, which should be translated as the one who, “…was appointed the Son of God…” (NIV’11).[19] To speak of Jesus as being “appointed as” or “determined to be” the Son of God might excite some readers. Is Paul disregarding Jesus’ eternal and inherent Sonship and claiming that Jesus was, at a specific point, appointed as Son? Moo says, “The tautologous nature of this statement reveals that being appointed Son has to do not with a change in essence – as if a person or human messiah becomes Son of God for the first time – but with a change in status or function.”[20] Paul’s vocabulary in Rom. 1:3-4 indicates the unique position that Jesus attained through his resurrection. Conveniently enough, each of these words are intimately connected to Ps. 2: Jesus as Son (cf. Rom. 1:3-4; Ps. 2:7, 12), Jesus as Messiah (cf. Rom. 1:4; Ps. 2:2), Jesus as Lord (cf. Rom. 1:4; Ps. 2:6).[21]
Early in my college days, I joined a local gym, and I remember feeling really proud when the step aerobics teacher told me what natural rhythm I had. I could grapevine with the best of them! I never really liked going to the gym for the weights or the treadmill, but I loved taking those step classes. It was so nice to get the recognition in a class full of skinnies.
It's also not particularly logical or even intelligent in the way it's executed. The bad guys have grabbed the daughter of the pure-hearted politician in order to force him to do their bidding and they somehow feel the need to move her across Europe using a guy who doesn't work for them. A stupid plan that is doomed to fail. Why even move her anywhere in the first place? And why do the eeeeeeevil industrialists insist on having their cargoships full of toxic waste unloaded in the Ukraine? Why not just let Somali pirates hijack them? Or just dump the waste in Somalia where no one will be able to oppose them? (Or some other equally corrupt and disorganized hell hole... the world is full of them.)
A report on the future of Abergavenny livestock market, commissioned by Abergavenny Civic Society, suggests that it would be cheaper to redevelop the existing site than build a new livestock market elsewhere. The report says redevelopment of the existing site would cost about £2.25m, but the council's plan would cost closer to £5m.
How to track through GPS location?
"The producers of Purefold don't have the rights to Philip K. Dick's original novel, Do Androids Dream Of Electric Sheep?, which provided the basis for Ridley Scott's film. As such, the series definitely won't be featuring any of Blade Runner's characters or specific situations, although I'm still holding out hope we'll finally get to see what's so damn unbelievable about attack ships on fire off the shoulder of Orion. Or C-beams glittering in the dark near the Tannhauser Gate, for that matter."
Unfortunately for me, I had to leave my friends and two more days of fun in San Sebastian to visit the university I will most likely be attending next year. The school had accepted me but they wanted a 1000 euro matriculation payment so obviously I wanted to see what the school was all about before I started throwing money into it.
While a few may laugh, the government’s apparent preoccupation with building has plenty of other Dushanbe residents grumbling. At a time when the majority of Tajiks are fighting a desperate battle againstpoverty, critics contend that vast state layouts for showpiece construction projects cannot be justified.
So, I have a few questions: What are your thoughts on the common core? Are you currently using The Daily Five in your classroom? How does it work for you?
